resort refuge recourse something or someone turned to for assistance or security; "his only recourse was the police"; "took refuge in lying".
shadow refuge from danger or observation; "he felt secure in his father's shadow".
inner_resource a resource provided by the mind or one's personal capabilities; "to have an inner resource against loneliness".
vantage advantage the quality of having a superior or more favorable position; "the experience gave him the advantage over me".
favour favor an advantage to the benefit of someone or something; "the outcome was in his favor".
leverage strategic advantage; power to act effectively; "relatively small groups can sometimes exert immense political leverage".
handicap advantage given to a competitor to equalize chances of winning.
lead an advantage held by a competitor in a race; "he took the lead at the last turn".
pull clout special advantage or influence; "the chairman's nephew has a lot of pull".
profit gain the advantageous quality of being beneficial.
account0 the quality of taking advantage; "she turned her writing skills to good account".
profitableness profitability lucrativeness gainfulness the quality of affording gain or benefit or profit.
privilege a special advantage or immunity or benefit not enjoyed by all.
expediency expedience the quality of being suited to the end in view.
superiority favourable_position favorable_position the quality of being at a competitive advantage.
edge a slight competitive advantage; "he had an edge on the competition".
whip_hand upper_hand position of advantage and control.
strong_suit strong_point strength specialty speciality metier long_suit forte an asset of special worth or utility; "cooking is his forte".
good benefit; "for your own good"; "what's the good of worrying?".
commonweal common_good the good of a community.
wiseness wisdom soundness the quality of being prudent and sensible.
advisability the quality of being advisable; "they questioned the advisability of our policy".
reasonableness goodness of reason and judgment; "the judiciary is built on the reasonableness of judges".
profitableness positivity positiveness favourableness favorableness advantageousness the quality of being encouraging or promising of a successful outcome.
propitiousness auspiciousness the favorable quality of strongly indicating a successful result.
limitation the quality of being limited or restricted; "it is a good plan but it has serious limitations".
richness the quality of having high intrinsic value; "the richness of the mines and pastureland"; "the cut of her clothes and the richness of the fabric were distinctive".
drawback the quality of being a hindrance; "he pointed out all the drawbacks to my plan".
inexpediency inexpedience the quality of being unsuited to the end in view.
constructiveness the quality of serving to build or improve.
virulency virulence extreme harmfulness (as the capacity of a microorganism to cause disease); "the virulence of the plague".
positivity positivism positiveness a quality or state characterized by certainty or acceptance or affirmation and dogmatic assertiveness.
affirmativeness the agreeable quality of one who assents.
self-assertiveness assertiveness aggressive self-assurance; given to making bold assertions.
importance the quality of being important and worthy of note; "the importance of a well-balanced diet".
big_deal anything of great importance or consequence.
magnitude relative importance; "a problem of the first magnitude".
account importance or value; "a person of considerable account"; "he predicted that although it is of small account now it will rapidly increase in importance".
momentousness utmost importance.
prominence relative importance.
illustriousness greatness the property possessed by something or someone of outstanding importance or eminence.
significance the quality of being significant; "do not underestimate the significance of nuclear power".
historicalness significance owing to its history.
meaningfulness the quality of having great value or significance.
sense_of_purpose purposefulness the quality of having a definite purpose.
moment import consequence having important effects or influence; "decisions of great consequence are made by the president himself"; "virtue is of more moment than security"; "that result is of no consequence".
essentialness essentiality basic importance.
vitalness the quality of being essential to maintain life.
sharpness edge the attribute of urgency in tone of voice; "his voice had an edge to it".
instancy imperativeness the quality of being insistent; "he pressed his demand with considerable instancy".
weightiness weight the relative importance granted to something; "his opinion carries great weight"; "the progression implied an increasing weightiness of the items listed".
dispensableness dispensability the quality possessed by something that you can get along without.
insignificance the quality of having little or no significance.
meaninglessness the quality of having no value or significance; "he resented the meaninglessness of the tasks they assigned him".
vacuity senselessness pointlessness mindlessness inanity total lack of meaning or ideas.
purposelessness aimlessness the quality of lacking any definite purpose.
due that which is deserved or owed; "give the devil his due".
grant a right or privilege that has been granted.
sanction authorization authority authorisation official permission or approval; "authority for the program was renewed several times".
right_to_privacy right to be free of unsanctioned intrusion.
right_to_liberty the right to be free.
preponderance superiority in power or influence; "the preponderance of good over evil"; "the preponderance of wealth and power".
puissance power to influence or coerce; "the puissance of the labor vote".
interestingness interest the power of attracting or holding one's attention (because it is unusual or exciting etc.); "they said nothing of great interest"; "primary colors can add interest to a room".
newsworthiness news the quality of being sufficiently interesting to be reported in news bulletins; "the judge conceded the newsworthiness of the trial"; "he is no longer news in the fashion world".
topicality the attribute of being of interest at the present time; "the library had to discard books that had lost their topicality".
vividness colour color interest and variety and intensity; "the Puritan Period was lacking in color"; "the characters were delineated with exceptional vividness".
shrillness the quality of being sharp or harsh to the senses; "the shrillness of her hair color".
influence a power to affect persons or events especially power based on prestige etc; "used her parents' influence to get the job".
heartbeat an animating or vital unifying force; "New York is the commercial heartbeat of America".
lifeblood an essential or life-giving force; "water is the lifeblood of India".
free_will discretion the power of making free choices unconstrained by external agencies.
effectualness effectuality effectivity effectiveness power to be effective; the quality of being able to bring about an effect.
trenchancy incisiveness keenness and forcefulness of thought or expression or intellect.
efficacy efficaciousness capacity or power to produce a desired effect; "concern about the safety and efficacy of the vaccine".
ability the quality of being able to perform; a quality that permits or facilitates achievement or accomplishment.
form4 an ability to perform well; "he was at the top of his form"; "the team was off form last night".
penetration the ability to make way into or through something; "the greater penetration of the new projectiles will result in greater injuries".
voice the ability to speak; "he lost his voice".
lung-power the ability to speak loudly.
capableness capability the quality of being capable -- physically or intellectually or legally; "he worked to the limits of his capability".
executability capability of being executed; "the job is executable for two million dollars"; "this contract is not executable".
envelope the maximum operating capability of a system (especially an aircraft); "test pilots try to push the envelope".
dullness the quality of lacking interestingness; "the stories were of a dullness to bring a buffalo to its knees".
insipidness insipidity dreariness boringness extreme dullness; lacking spirit or interest.
romanticism romance an exciting and mysterious quality (as of a heroic time or adventure).
selectivity the property of being selective.
domesticity the quality of being domestic or domesticated; "a royal family living in unpretentious domesticity".
finitude finiteness boundedness the quality of being finite.
quantifiability measurability the quality of being measurable.
ratability the quality of being capable of being rated or estimated.
scalability the quality of being scalable.
solubility the quality of being soluble and easily dissolved in liquid.
insolubility the quality of being insoluble and difficult to dissolve in liquid.
comicality the quality of being comical.
voluptuousness hot_stuff the quality of being attractive and exciting (especially sexually exciting); "he thought she was really hot stuff".
humour humor the quality of being funny; "I fail to see the humor in it".
optimism a general disposition to expect the best in all things.
epicurism the disposition and habits of an epicure.
gourmandism the disposition and habits of a gourmand.
frigidness frigidity sexual unresponsiveness (especially of women) and inability to achieve orgasm during intercourse.
subjectivism the quality of being subjective.
ulteriority the quality of being ulterior; "their conversation was limited to ulteriorities"; "a terrible feeling of ulteriority"; "his stories were too susceptible to ulteriority".
woodsiness woodiness the quality of abounding in trees.
sylvian_fissure sulcus_lateralis_cerebri lateral_cerebral_sulcus fissure_of_sylvius the deepest and most prominent of the cortical fissures; separates the frontal lobes and temporal lobes in both hemispheres.
parieto-occipital_sulcus parieto-occipital_fissure a sulcus near the posterior end of each hemisphere that separates the parietal lobes and the occipital lobes in both hemispheres.
sphenion the anterior tip of the parietal bone.
sinus_venosus_sclerae schlemm's_canal canal_of_schlemm a circular canal in the eye that drains aqueous humor from the anterior chamber of the eye into the anterior ciliary veins.
sausage_curl a fat sausage-shaped curl.
facial_hair hair on the face (especially on the face of a man).
soul_patch attilio a small patch of facial hair just below the lower lip and above the chin.
socket a bony hollow into which a structure fits.
carnassial_tooth the last upper premolar and first lower molar teeth of a carnivore; having sharp edges for cutting flesh.
erectile_tissue vascular tissue capable of filling with blood and becoming rigid.
striated_muscle skeletal_muscle a muscle that is connected at either or both ends to a bone and so move parts of the skeleton; a muscle that is characterized by transverse stripes.
voluntary_muscle striated muscle that can be controlled voluntarily.
musculus_abductor_hallucis the abductor muscle of the great toe.
musculus_adductor_hallucis the adductor muscle of the great toe.
third_eye pineal_eye a sensory structure capable of light reception located on the dorsal side of the diencephalon in various reptiles.
permanent_tooth adult_tooth any of the 32 teeth that replace the deciduous teeth of early childhood and (with luck) can last until old age.
od oculus_dexter the right eye.
choroid_coat choroid a highly vascular membrane in the eye between the retina and the sclera; a dark pigmentation minimizes the scattering of light inside the eye.
uveoscleral_pathway a tubule that drains excess aqueous humor.
hyaloid_membrane hyaloid the transparent membrane enveloping the vitreous humor of the eye and separating it from the retina.
organ_of_hearing the part of the ear that is responsible for sensations of sound.
tympanum tympanic_cavity middle_ear the main cavity of the ear; between the eardrum and the inner ear.
superior_cerebellar_artery the superior branch of the cerebellar artery.
intestinal_artery ileal_artery arteria_ileum branch of the superior mesenteric artery that supplies the ileum.
jejunal_artery intestinal_artery an artery that is a branch of the superior mesenteric artery that supplies the jejunum.
renal_artery arteria_renalis an artery originating from the abdominal aorta and supplying the kidneys and adrenal glands and ureters.
vena_epigastrica_superficialis superficial_epigastric_vein empties into the great saphenous vein.
venae_epigastricae_superiores superior_epigastric_veins veins that accompany the superior epigastric artery.
vena_ethmoidalis ethmoidal_vein veins that drain the ethmoidal sinuses and empty into the superior ophthalmic vein.
vena_gastroomentalis gastroomental_vein gastroepiploic_vein one of two veins serving the great curvature of the stomach.
vena_lacrimalis lacrimal_vein drains the lacrimal gland; empties into the superior ophthalmic vein.
superior_ophthalmic_vein a vein that begins at the inner angle of the eye socket and passes through the superior orbital fissure to empty into the cavernous sinus.
venae_pancreatica pancreatic_vein veins draining the pancreas and emptying into the superior mesenteric and splenic veins.
vena_poplitea popliteal_vein a vein arising in the knee and ascending to become the femoral vein.
vena_posterior_ventriculi_sinistri posterior_vein_of_the_left_ventricle arises near the apex of the heart and empties into the coronary sinus.
vena_pulmonalis_superior superior_pulmonary_vein either of two pulmonary veins (left and right) returning blood from the superior lobes of the lungs.
venae_sclerales scleral_veins tributaries of the anterior ciliary veins that drain the sclera of the eye.
hepatic_lobe any of the five lobes forming the liver.
lobe_of_the_lung any of the three lobes of the right lung or the two lobes of the left lung.
thoracic_duct the major duct of the lymphatic system.
antiserum blood serum containing antibodies against specific antigens; provides immunity to a disease.
epinephrine epinephrin adrenaline adrenalin a catecholamine secreted by the adrenal medulla in response to stress (trade name Adrenalin); stimulates autonomic nerve action.
gi_hormones gastrointestinal_hormone hormones that affect gastrointestinal functioning.
autocoid autacoid any physiologically active internal secretion especially one of uncertain classification.
patent_ductus_arteriosus a ductus arteriosus that failed to close at birth; may require surgical correction.
visceral_pericardium epicardium the innermost of the two layers of the pericardium.
cytoplast the intact cytoplasmic content of a cell.
ectoplasm the outer granule-free layer of cytoplasm.
mitochondrion chondriosome an organelle containing enzymes responsible for producing energy.
scavenger_cell phagocyte a cell that engulfs and digests debris and invading microorganisms.
b_lymphocyte b_cell a lymphocyte derived from bone marrow that provides humoral immunity; it recognizes free antigen molecules in solution and matures into plasma cells that secrete immunoglobulin (antibodies) that inactivate the antigens.
t_lymphocyte t_cell a small lymphocyte developed in the thymus; it orchestrates the immune system's response to infected or malignant cells.
basophile basophil a leukocyte with basophilic granules easily stained by basic stains.
neutrophile neutrophil the chief phagocytic leukocyte; stains with either basic or acid dyes.
eosinophile eosinophil a leukocyte readily stained with eosin.
sarcostyle myofibrilla myofibril one of many contractile filaments that make up a striated muscle fiber.
microglia neuroglial tissue of mesodermal origin that can become phagocytic.
commissure a bundle of nerve fibers passing from one side to the other of the brain or spinal cord.
pia_mater the highly vascular innermost of the 3 meninges.
cerebellar_hemisphere either of two lateral lobes of the cerebellum.
renal_cortex the cortex of the kidney containing the glomeruli and the convoluted tubules.
plexus_hypogastricus hypogastric_plexus a plexus of nerves serving the pelvic viscera.
plexus_dentalis a plexus of nerves serving the teeth.
imperforate_anus a congenital defect of the anus; there is partial or complete obstruction of the anal opening.
frontal_eminence either prominence of the frontal bone above each orbit.
sutura_frontalis frontal_suture the suture between two halves of the frontal bone (usually obliterated by the age of 6).
tubular_cavity a cavity having the shape of a tube.
wasp_waist a very slender waist.
spare_tire love_handle excess fat around the waistline.
spindleshanks spindlelegs long thin legs.
paw mitt manus hand the (prehensile) extremity of the superior limb; "he had the hands of a surgeon"; "he extended his mitt".
meat_hooks maulers hooks large strong hand (as of a fighter); "wait till I get my hooks on him".
onyxis ingrown_toenail toenail having its free tip or edges embedded in the surrounding flesh.
lantern_jaw a long thin lower jaw.
telomere either (free) end of a eukaryotic chromosome; "telomeres act as caps to keep the sticky ends of chromosomes from randomly clumping together".
psyche nous mind head brain that which is responsible for one's thoughts and feelings; the seat of the faculty of reason; "his mind wandered"; "I couldn't get his words out of my head".
public_knowledge general_knowledge knowledge that is available to anyone.
light2 public awareness; "it brought the scandal to light".
tabula_rasa a young mind not yet affected by experience (according to John Locke).
ego (psychoanalysis) the conscious mind.
profundity profoundness depth deepness astuteness the intellectual ability to penetrate deeply into ideas.
sagacity sagaciousness judgment judgement discernment the mental ability to understand and discriminate between relations.
eye good discernment (either visually or as if visually); "she has an eye for fresh talent"; "he has an artist's eye".
sense mother_wit horse_sense gumption good_sense common_sense sound practical judgment; "Common sense is not so common"; "he hasn't got the sense God gave little green apples"; "fortunately she had the good sense to run away".
logic reasoned and reasonable judgment; "it made a certain kind of logic".
nous common sense; "she has great social nous".
road_sense good judgment in avoiding trouble or accidents on the road.
judiciousness good judgment.
precaution forethought caution care judiciousness in avoiding harm or danger; "he exercised caution in opening the door"; "he handled the vase with care".
injudiciousness indiscreetness lacking good judgment.
know-how the (technical) knowledge and skill required to do something.
wisdom sapience ability to apply knowledge or experience or understanding or common sense and insight.
intelligence the ability to comprehend; to understand and profit from experience.
wit mentality mental_capacity learning_ability brainpower brain mental ability; "he's got plenty of brains but no common sense".
largeness comprehensiveness breadth the capacity to understand a broad range of topics; "a teacher must have a breadth of knowledge of the subject"; "a man distinguished by the largeness and scope of his views".
mind intellect knowledge and intellectual ability; "he reads to improve his mind"; "he has a keen intellect".
quickness quick-wittedness mental_quickness intelligence as revealed by an ability to give correct responses without delay.
genius brilliance unusual mental ability.
scintillation a brilliant display of wit.
sharpness keenness acuteness acuity a quick and penetrating intelligence; "he argued with great acuteness"; "I admired the keenness of his mind".
smartness cleverness brightness intelligence as manifested in being quick and witty.
wiliness slyness guile foxiness cunning craftiness craft shrewdness as demonstrated by being skilled in deception.
shrewdness perspicacity perspicaciousness astuteness intelligence manifested by being astute (as in business dealings).
insightfulness acumen shrewdness shown by keen insight.
knowingness shrewdness demonstrated by knowledge.
wits marbles the basic human power of intelligent thought and perception; "he used his wits to get ahead"; "I was scared out of my wits"; "he still had all his marbles and was in full possession of a lively mind".
aptitude inherent ability.
instinct inherent_aptitude inborn pattern of behavior often responsive to specific stimuli; "the spawning instinct in salmon"; "altruistic instincts in social animals".
mental_ability capacity the power to learn or retain knowledge; in law, the ability to understand the facts and significance of your behavior.
potentiality capableness capability an aptitude that may be developed.
perfectibility the capability of becoming perfect; "he believes in the ultimate perfectibility of man".
reach range grasp compass the limit of capability; "within the compass of education".
talent natural_endowment gift endowment natural abilities or qualities.
genius flair a natural talent; "he has a flair for mathematics"; "he has a genius for interior decorating".
raw_talent powerfully impressive talent.
creativity creativeness creative_thinking the ability to create.
fruitfulness fecundity the intellectual productivity of a creative imagination.
flight passing above and beyond ordinary bounds; "a flight of fancy"; "flights of rhetoric"; "flights of imagination".
wizardry genius exceptional creative ability.
fairyland faery faerie the enchanted realm of fairies.
garden_of_eden eden a beautiful garden where Adam and Eve were placed at the Creation; when they disobeyed and ate the forbidden fruit from the tree of knowledge of good and evil they were driven from their paradise (the fall of man).
paradise (Christianity) the abode of righteous souls after death.
limbo (theology) in Roman Catholicism, the place of unbaptized but innocent or righteous souls (such as infants and virtuous individuals).
never-never_land dreamworld dreamland a pleasing country existing only in dreams or imagination.
zion utopia sion an imaginary place considered to be perfect or ideal.
invention innovation excogitation design conception the creation of something in the mind.
contrivance the faculty of contriving; inventive skill; "his skillful contrivance of answers to every problem".
innovativeness originality by virtue of introducing new ideas.
eristic the art of logical disputation (especially if specious).
homiletics the art of preaching.
minstrelsy the art of a minstrel.
skill science ability to produce solutions in some problem domain; "the skill of a well-trained boxer"; "the sweet science of pugilism".
nose a natural skill; "he has a nose for good deals".
virtuosity technical skill or fluency or style exhibited by a virtuoso.
bravura brilliant and showy technical skill; "in a final bravura the ballerina appeared to be floating in water"; "the music ends with a display of bravura".
skill attainment acquisition acquirement accomplishment an ability that has been acquired by training.
hand ability; "he wanted to try his hand at singing".
workmanship craftsmanship craft skill in an occupation or trade.
horsemanship skill in handling and riding horses.
literacy the ability to read and write.
marksmanship skill in shooting.
prowess artistry art a superior skill that you can learn by study and practice and observation; "the art of conversation"; "it's quite an art".
numeracy skill with numbers and mathematics.
oarsmanship skill as an oarsman.
seamanship skill in sailing.
boatmanship skill in handling boats.
showmanship the ability to present something (especially theatrical shows) in an attractive manner.
soldiership soldiering skills that are required for the life of soldier.
swordsmanship skill in fencing.
skillfulness the state of being cognitively skillful.
expertness expertise skillfulness by virtue of possessing special knowledge.
sophistication being expert or having knowledge of some technical subject; "understanding affine transformations requires considerable mathematical sophistication".
coordination the skillful and effective interaction of movements.
versatility having a wide variety of skills.
mastery control command great skillfulness and knowledge of some subject or activity; "a good command of French".
quickness facility deftness adroitness adeptness skillful performance or ability without difficulty; "his quick adeptness was a product of good design"; "he was famous for his facility as an archer".
touch1 deftness in handling matters; "he has a master's touch".
finishing_touch copestone capstone a final touch; a crowning achievement; a culmination.
housecraft skill in domestic management.
stagecraft skill in writing or staging plays.
tradecraft skill acquired through experience in a trade; often used to discuss skill in espionage; "instructional designers are trained in something that might be called tradecraft"; "the CIA chief of station accepted responsibility for his agents' failures of tradecraft".
watercraft skill in the management of boats.
efficiency skillfulness in avoiding wasted time and effort; "she did the work with great efficiency".
slow-wittedness dumbness denseness the quality of being mentally slow and limited.
obtuseness dullness the quality of being slow to understand.
imperfectibility the capability of becoming imperfect.
incapacity lack of intellectual power.
unskillfulness a lack of cognitive skill.
module mental_faculty faculty one of the inherent cognitive or perceptual powers of the mind.
retentivity retentiveness retention memory the power of retaining and recalling past experience; "he had a good memory when he was younger".
understanding reason intellect the capacity for rational thought or inference or discrimination; "we are told that man is endowed with reason and capable of distinguishing good from evil".
will volition the capability of conscious choice and decision and intention; "the exercise of their volition we construe as revolt"- George Meredith.
acuteness a sensitivity that is keen and highly developed; "dogs have a remarkable acuteness of smell".
hypersensitivity extreme sensitivity.
responsiveness reactivity responsive to stimulation.
oxyopia unusually acute vision.
trichromacy color_vision chromatic_vision the normal ability to see colors.
twilight_vision scotopic_vision night_vision night-sight the ability to see in reduced illumination (as in moonlight).
ear good hearing; "he had a keen ear"; "a good ear for pitch".
taste sense_of_taste gustatory_modality gustation the faculty of distinguishing sweet, sour, bitter, and salty properties in the mouth; "his cold deprived him of his sense of taste".
teaching_method pedagogy pedagogics the principles and methods of instruction.
method_of_choice the best method to achieve a desired result.
system_of_rules system a complex of methods or rules governing behavior; "they have to operate under a system they oppose"; "that language has a complex system for indicating gender".
discipline a system of rules of conduct or method of practice; "he quickly learned the discipline of prison routine"; "for such a plan to work requires discipline";.
system_of_logic logical_system logic a system of reasoning.
aristotelian_logic the syllogistic logic of Aristotle as developed by Boethius in the Middle Ages.
organon a system of principles for philosophic or scientific investigations; an instrument for acquiring knowledge.
practice knowledge of how something is usually done; "it is not the local practice to wear shorts to dinner".
tradition custom a specific practice of long standing.
courtly_love (Middle Ages) a highly conventionalized code of conduct for lovers.
knight_errantry (Middle Ages) the code of conduct observed by a knight errant who is wandering in search of deeds of chivalry.
protocol code of correct conduct; "safety protocols"; "academic protocol".
heritage practices that are handed down from the past by tradition; "a heritage of freedom".
enthusiasm a lively interest; "enthusiasm for his program is growing".
balletomania extraordinary enthusiasm for ballets.
concern something that interests you because it is important or affects you; "the safety of the ship is the captain's concern".
interestedness the state of being interested.
personal_matters personal_business affairs matters of personal concern; "get his affairs in order".
point_of_honor a concern that seriously reflects on your honor.
forgetfulness tendency to forget.
transient_global_amnesia memory disorder seen in middle aged and elderly persons; characterized by an episode of amnesia and bewilderment that lasts for several hours; person is otherwise alert and intellectually active.
consciousness an alert cognitive state in which you are aware of yourself and your situation; "he lost consciousness".
knowingness consciousness cognizance cognisance awareness having knowledge of; "he had no awareness of his mistakes"; "his sudden consciousness of the problem he faced"; "their intelligence and general knowingness was impressive".
incognizance a lack of knowledge or recognition.
self-awareness awareness of your own individuality.
self-consciousness self-awareness plus the additional realization that others are similarly aware of you.
unselfconsciousness the quality of being not self-conscious; unawareness of yourself or of others' views of yourself; "he had the unselfconsciousness of a child".
feel an intuitive awareness; "he has a feel for animals" or "it's easy when you get the feel of it";.
sense a general conscious awareness; "a sense of security"; "a sense of happiness"; "a sense of danger"; "a sense of self".
sense_of_responsibility an awareness of your obligations.
wakefulness a periodic state during which you are conscious and aware of the world; "consciousness during wakefulness in a sane person is pretty well ordered and familiar".
wonder curiosity a state in which you want to learn more about something.
secret mystery enigma closed_book something that baffles understanding and cannot be explained; "how it got out is a mystery"; "it remains one of nature's secrets".
temptation enticement something that seduces or has the quality to seduce.
forbidden_fruit originally an apple from the tree of knowledge of good and evil in the Garden of Eden; it is now used to refer to anything that is tempting but dangerous (as sexuality).
allurement attractiveness; "its allurement was its remoteness".
complement either of two parts that mutually complete each other.
overconfidence cocksureness certitude total certainty or greater certainty than circumstances warrant.
uncertainty incertitude dubiousness dubiety doubtfulness doubt the state of being unsure of something.
suspicion mistrust misgiving distrust doubt about someone's honesty.
skepticism mental_rejection incredulity disbelief doubt about the truth of something.
absentmindedness preoccupation so great that the ordinary demands on attention are ignored.
notice polite or favorable attention; "his hard work soon attracted the teacher's notice".
advertency advertence the process of being heedful.
focussing focusing focus focal_point direction centering the concentration of attention or energy on something; "the focus of activity shifted to molecular biology"; "he had no direction in his life".
particularism a focus on something particular.
hang-up an emotional preoccupation.
jealousy zealous vigilance; "cherish their official political freedom with fierce jealousy"-Paul Blanshard.
sixth_sense insight grasping the inner nature of things intuitively.
immediate_apprehension immediacy immediate intuitive awareness.
perception the process of perceiving.
perception knowledge gained by perceiving; "a man admired for the depth of his perception".
perceptiveness discernment perception of that which is obscure.
penetration insight clear or deep perception of a situation.
remark explicit notice; "it passed without remark".
tonal_pattern melody the perception of pleasant arrangements of musical notes.
threshold limen the smallest detectable sensation.
scent perfume fragrance aroma a distinctive odor that is pleasant.
incense the pleasing scent produced when incense is burned; "incense filled the room".
vanilla a distinctive fragrant flavor characteristic of vanilla beans.
flatness a deficiency in flavor; "it needed lemon juice to sharpen the flatness of the dried lentils".
music euphony any agreeable (pleasing and harmonious) sounds; "he fell asleep to the music of the wind chimes".
music_of_the_spheres an inaudible music that Pythagoras thought was produced by the celestial.
racket noise dissonance the auditory experience of sound that lacks musical quality; sound that is a disagreeable auditory experience; "modern music is just noise to me".
chromesthesia chromaesthesia a form of synesthesia in which nonvisual stimulation results in the experience of color sensations.
comfort_zone the temperature range (between 28 and 30 degrees Centigrade) at which the naked human body is able to maintain a heat balance without shivering or sweating.
statistical_distribution distribution (statistics) an arrangement of values of a variable showing their observed or theoretical frequency of occurrence.
critical_appraisal critical_analysis an appraisal based on careful analytical evaluation.
critique criticism a serious examination and judgment of something; "constructive criticism is always appreciated".
self-criticism criticism of yourself.
attribution ascription assigning some quality or character to a person or thing; "the attribution of language to birds"; "the ascription to me of honors I had not earned".
overvaluation too high a value or price assigned to something.
double_check countercheck something that checks the correctness of a previous check.
diagnostic_test diagnostic_assay an assay conducted for diagnostic purposes.
widal_test widal's_test a test for detecting typhoid fever and other salmonella infections.
wassermann_test wassermann wasserman_reaction a blood test to detect syphilis; a complement fixation test is used to detect antibodies to the syphilis organism treponema; a positive reaction indicates the presence of antibodies and therefore syphilis infection.
acid_test a rigorous or crucial appraisal.
review revaluation reassessment reappraisal a new appraisal or evaluation.
word-splitting hairsplitting making too fine distinctions of little importance; "they didn't take his hairsplitting seriously".
taste perceptiveness discernment appreciation delicate discrimination (especially of aesthetic values); "arrogance and lack of taste contributed to his rapid success"; "to ask at that particular time was the ultimate in bad taste".
virtu vertu connoisseurship love of or taste for fine objects of art.
fashion the latest and most admired style in clothes and cosmetics and behavior.
rage furore furor fad cult craze an interest followed with exaggerated zeal; "he always follows the latest fads"; "it was all the rage that season".
retro a fashion reminiscent of the past.
discretion delicacy refined taste; tact.
culture the tastes in art and manners that are favored by a social group.
digestion learning and coming to understand ideas and information; "his appetite for facts was better than his digestion".
internalization internalisation incorporation learning (of values or attitudes etc.) that is incorporated within yourself.
work study applying the mind to learning and understanding a subject (especially by reading); "mastering a second language requires a lot of work"; "no schools offer graduate study in interior design".
mastering becoming proficient in the use of something; having mastery of; "his mastering the art of cooking took a long time".
conditioned_emotional_response conditioned_emotion cer an emotional response that has been acquired by conditioning.
mind recall or remembrance; "it came to mind".
mirror a faithful depiction or reflection; "the best mirror is an old friend".
dreaming dream imaginative thoughts indulged in while awake; "he lives in a dream that has nothing to do with reality".
woolgathering an idle indulgence in fantasy.
thought_process thought thinking mentation intellection cerebration the process of using your mind to consider something carefully; "thinking always made him frown"; "she paused for thought".
reasoning logical_thinking abstract_thought thinking that is coherent and logical.
logical_argument line_of_reasoning line argumentation argument a course of reasoning aimed at demonstrating a truth or falsehood; the methodical process of logical reasoning; "I can't follow your line of reasoning".
syllogism deductive reasoning in which a conclusion is derived from two premises.
presumption (law) an inference of the truth of a fact from other facts proved or admitted or judicially noticed.
dissection a minute and critical analysis.
ratiocination logical and methodical reasoning.
study cogitation attentive consideration and meditation; "after much cogitation he rejected the offer".
consideration the process of giving careful thought to something.
weighing deliberation advisement careful consideration; "a little deliberation would have deterred them".
thoughtfulness rumination reflexion reflection musing contemplation a calm, lengthy, intent consideration.
self-examination self-contemplation introspection the contemplation of your own thoughts and desires and conduct.
inwardness preoccupation especially with one's attitudes and ethical or ideological values; "the sensitiveness of James's characters, their seeming inwardness"; "inwardness is what an Englishman quite simply has, painlessly, as a birthright".
prejudgment prejudgement a judgment reached before the evidence is available.
favourite favorite something regarded with special favor or liking; "that book is one of my favorites".
wish the particular preference that you have; "it was his last wish"; "they should respect the wishes of the people".
way0 doing as one pleases or chooses; "if I had my way".
impossible something that cannot be done; "his assignment verged on the impossible".
explanation thought that makes something comprehensible.
key something crucial for explaining; "the key to development is economic integration".
raison_d'etre reason for being.
deliberation calculation planning something carefully and intentionally; "it was the deliberation of his act that was insulting".
tryout trial_run trial test trying something to find out about it; "a sample for ten days free trial"; "a trial of progesterone failed to relieve the pain".
overreckoning overrating overestimation overestimate a calculation that results in an estimate that is too high.
know the fact of being aware of information that is known to few people; "he is always in the know".
comprehension an ability to understand the meaning or importance of something (or the knowledge acquired as a result); "how you can do that is beyond my comprehension"; "he was famous for his comprehension of American literature".
hold grasp appreciation understanding of the nature or meaning or quality or magnitude of something; "he has a good grasp of accounting practices".
sense a natural appreciation or ability; "a keen musical sense"; "a good sense of timing".
hindsight understanding the nature of an event after it has happened; "hindsight is always better than foresight".
light0 mental understanding as an enlightening experience; "he finally saw the light"; "can you shed light on this problem?".
find discovery breakthrough a productive insight.
flash a sudden brilliant understanding; "he had a flash of intuition".
pabulum insipid intellectual nourishment.
conversation_piece something interesting that stimulates conversation.
cynosure something that strongly attracts attention and admiration; "if he was the cynosure of all eyes he didn't notice".
passion love any object of warm affection or devotion; "the theater was her first love"; "he has a passion for cock fighting";.
thing-in-itself noumenon the intellectual conception of a thing as it is in itself, not as it is known through perception.
issue an important question that is in dispute and must be settled; "the issue could be settled by requiring public education for everyone"; "politicians never discuss the real issues".
hot-button_issue gut_issue an issue that elicits strong emotional reactions.
paramount_issue an issue whose settlement is more important than anything else; and issue that must be settled before anything else can be settled.
blind_spot a subject about which you are ignorant or prejudiced and fail to exercise good judgment; "golf is one of his blind spots and he's proud of it".
remit the topic that a person, committee, or piece of research is expected to deal with or has authority to deal with; "they set up a group with a remit to suggest ways for strengthening family life".
information knowledge acquired through study or experience or instruction.
matter_of_fact a matter that is an actual fact or is demonstrable as a fact.
scientific_fact an observation that has been confirmed repeatedly and is accepted as true (although its truth is never final).
reason a fact that logically justifies some premise or conclusion; "there is reason to believe he is lying".
truth a fact that has been verified; "at last he knew the truth"; "the truth is that he didn't want to do it".
verity an enduring or necessary ethical or religious or aesthetic truth.
background_knowledge background information that is essential to understanding a situation or problem; "the embassy filled him in on the background of the incident".
verification substantiation confirmation check additional proof that something that was believed (some fact or hypothesis or theory) is correct; "fossils provided further confirmation of the evolutionary theory".
induction evocation elicitation stimulation that calls up (draws forth) a particular class of behaviors; "the elicitation of his testimony was not easy".
turn-on something causing excitement or stimulating interest.
conditioned_stimulus the stimulus that is the occasion for a conditioned response.
reinforcing_stimulus reinforcer reinforcement (psychology) a stimulus that strengthens or weakens the behavior that produced it.
positive_stimulus a stimulus with desirable consequences.
fillip bonus anything that tends to arouse; "his approval was an added fillip".
pleasure joy delight something or someone that provides a source of happiness; "a joy to behold"; "the pleasure of his company"; "the new car is a delight".
nuisance (law) a broad legal concept including anything that disturbs the reasonable use of your property or endangers life and health or is offensive.
worry vexation headache concern something or someone that causes anxiety; a source of unhappiness; "New York traffic is a constant concern"; "it's a major worry".
business a rightful concern or responsibility; "it's none of your business"; "mind your own business".
sorrow grief something that causes great unhappiness; "her death was a great grief to John".
thought idea the content of cognition; the main thing you are thinking about; "it was not a good idea"; "the thought never entered my mind".
inspiration arousal of the mind to special unusual activity or creativity.
afflatus a strong creative impulse; divine inspiration; "divine afflatus".
conceptualization conceptuality conceptualisation an elaborated concept.
perception a way of conceiving something; "Luther had a new perception of the Bible".
iron_trap a trap from which there is no escape.
pigeonhole a specific (often simplistic) category.
gothic_architecture gothic a style of architecture developed in northern France that spread throughout Europe between the 12th and 16th centuries; characterized by slender vertical piers and counterbalancing buttresses and by vaulting and pointed arches.
species a specific kind of something; "a species of molecule"; "a species of villainy".
make brand a recognizable kind; "there's a new brand of hero in the movies now"; "what make of car is that?".
manner a kind; "what manner of man are you?".
stripe a kind or category; "businessmen of every stripe joined in opposition to the proposal".
the_likes_of the_like like a similar kind; "dogs, foxes, and the like", "we don't want the likes of you around here".
rule regulation a principle or condition that customarily governs behavior; "it was his rule to take a walk before breakfast"; "short haircuts were the regulation".
restriction limitation a principle that limits the extent of something; "I am willing to accept certain restrictions on my movements".
rule1 formula (mathematics) a standard procedure for solving a class of mathematical problems; "he determined the upper bound with Descartes' rule of signs"; "he gave us a general formula for attacking polynomials".
rule_of_thumb guidepost guideline a rule or principle that provides guidance to appropriate behavior.
quality lineament character a characteristic property that defines the apparent individual nature of something; "each town has a quality all its own"; "the radical character of our demands".
texture the essential quality of something; "the texture of Neapolitan life".
badge any feature that is regarded as a sign of status (a particular power or quality or rank); "wearing a tie was regarded as a badge of respectability".
centrepiece centerpiece the central or most important feature; "education was the centerpiece of the Democratic Party's political platform".
peculiarity distinguishing_characteristic distinctive_feature an odd or unusual characteristic.
calling_card a distinguishing characteristic or behavior; "bombs are a terrorist's calling cards".
downside a negative aspect of something that is generally positive; "there is a downside even to motherhood".
surface a superficial aspect as opposed to the real nature of something; "it was not what it appeared to be on the surface".
foil enhancer anything that serves by contrast to call attention to another thing's good qualities; "pretty girls like plain friends as foils".
teacher a personified abstraction that teaches; "books were his teachers"; "experience is a demanding teacher".
monic_polynomial a polynomial in one variable.
scalar a variable quantity that cannot be resolved into components.
law_of_nature law a generalization that describes recurring facts or events in nature; "the laws of thermodynamics".
law_of_effect (psychology) the principle that behaviors are selected by their consequences; behavior having good consequences tends to be repeated whereas behavior that leads to bad consequences is not repeated.
gresham's_law (economics) the principle that when two kinds of money having the same denominational value are in circulation the intrinsically more valuable money will be hoarded and the money of lower intrinsic value will circulate more freely until the intrinsically more valuable money is driven out of circulation; bad money drives out good; credited to Sir Thomas Gresham.
gemmule the physically discrete element that Darwin proposed as responsible for heredity.
fact a concept whose truth can be proved; "scientific hypotheses are not facts".
requirement prerequisite something that is required in advance; "Latin was a prerequisite for admission".
sine_qua_non essential_condition a prerequisite.
logical_fallacy a fallacy in logical argumentation.
hysteron_proteron the logical fallacy of using as a true premise a proposition that is yet to be proved.
petitio_principii petitio the logical fallacy of assuming the conclusion in the premises; begging the question.
self-deception self-deceit a misconception that is favorable to the person who holds it.
infantile_autism a rare but serious syndrome of childhood characterized by withdrawal and lack of social responsiveness or interest in others and serious linguistic deficits; "there is considerable dispute among specialists concerning infantile autism".
flying_dutchman a phantom ship that is said to appear in storms near the Cape of Good Hope.
rehabilitation_program a program for restoring someone to good health.
strategy scheme an elaborate and systematic plan of action.
wheeze (Briticism) a clever or amusing scheme or trick; "a clever wheeze probably succeeded in neutralizing the German espionage threat".
figment a contrived or fantastic idea; "a figment of the imagination".
pillar a fundamental principle or practice; "science eroded the pillars of superstition".
shahadah the first pillar of Islam is an affirmation of faith.
yang the bright positive masculine principle in Chinese dualistic cosmology; "yin and yang together produce everything that comes into existence".
theorem an idea accepted as a demonstrable truth.
whimsy whimsey whim notion an odd or fanciful or capricious idea; "the theatrical notion of disguise is associated with disaster in his stories"; "he had a whimsy about flying to the moon"; "whimsy can be humorous to someone with time to enjoy it".
sum substance pith nub nitty-gritty meat marrow kernel inwardness heart_and_soul heart gist essence core centre center the choicest or most essential or most vital part of some idea or experience; "the gist of the prosecutor's argument"; "the heart and soul of the Republican Party"; "the nub of the story".
hypostasis (metaphysics) essential nature or underlying reality.
quintessence the purest and most concentrated essence of something.
stuff a critically important or characteristic component; "suspense is the very stuff of narrative".
undertone undercurrent a subdued emotional quality underlying an utterance; implicit meaning.
perfection paragon idol beau_ideal an ideal instance; a perfect embodiment of a concept.
gold_standard a paragon of excellence; "academic education is the gold standard against which other educational activity is pejoratively judged".
model good_example exemplar example something to be imitated; "an exemplar of success"; "a model of clarity"; "he is the very model of a modern major general".
beauty beaut an outstanding example of its kind; "his roses were beauties"; "when I make a mistake it's a beaut".
wisdom accumulated knowledge or erudition or enlightenment.
reconditeness profundity profoundness abstrusity abstruseness wisdom that is recondite and abstruse and profound; "the anthropologist was impressed by the reconditeness of the native proverbs".
eye_candy visual images that are pleasing to see but are intellectually undemanding; "he wanted to put some eye candy on their web site".
visual_field field_of_vision field_of_regard all of the points of the physical environment that can be perceived by a stable eye at a given moment.
tableau any dramatic scene.
recollection something recalled to the mind.
pilot original archetype something that serves as a model or a basis for making copies; "this painting is a copy of the original".
pattern a model considered worthy of imitation; "the American constitution has provided a pattern for many republics".
templet template guide a model or standard for making comparisons.
prodigy an impressive or wonderful example of a particular quality; "the Marines are expected to perform prodigies of valor".
concretism concrete_representation a representation of an abstract idea in concrete terms.
shape embodiment a concrete representation of an otherwise nebulous concept; "a circle was the embodiment of his concept of life".
belief any cognitive content held as true.
apophatism the religious belief that God cannot be known but is completely `other' and must be described in negative terms (in terms of what God is not).
meliorism the belief that the world can be made better by human effort.
eyes opinion or judgment; "in the eyes of the law"; "I was wrong in her eyes".
revolutionism a belief in the spread of revolutionary principles.
unseen spiritual_world spiritual_domain a belief that there is a realm controlled by a divine spirit.
superstitious_notion superstition an irrational belief arising from ignorance or fear.
theory a belief that can guide behavior; "the architect has a theory that more is less"; "they killed him on the theory that dead men tell no tales".
egoism (ethics) the theory that the pursuit of your own welfare in the basis of morality.
patchwork jumble hodgepodge a theory or argument made up of miscellaneous or incongruous ideas.
theosophy a system of belief based on mystical insight into the nature of God and the soul.
theosophism belief in theosophy.
anthroposophy a system of beliefs and practices based on the philosophy of Rudolf Steiner; it claims to integrate the practical and psychological in child-centered education.
qabbalah qabbala kabbalah kabbala kabala cabbalah cabbala cabala an esoteric theosophy of rabbinical origin based on the Hebrew scriptures and developed between the 7th and 18th centuries.
vampirism belief in the existence of vampires.
principle a rule or standard especially of good behavior; "a man of principle"; "he will not violate his principles".
knightliness chivalry the medieval principles governing knighthood and knightly conduct.
hellenism the principles and ideals associated with classical Greek civilization.
scruple an ethical or moral principle that inhibits action.
amoralism the doctrine that moral distinctions are invalid.
british_empiricism the predominant philosophical tradition in Great Britain since the 17th century.
dualism the doctrine that reality consists of two basic opposing elements, often taken to be mind and matter (or mind and body), or good and evil.
functionalism any doctrine that stresses utility or purpose.
gospel a doctrine that is believed to be of great importance; "Newton's writings were gospel for those who followed".
imitation the doctrine that representations of nature or human behavior should be accurate imitations.
mimesis the imitative representation of nature and human behavior in art and literature.
individualism a belief in the importance of the individual and the virtue of self-reliance and personal independence.
nationalism the doctrine that your national culture and interests are superior to any other.
election the predestination of some individuals as objects of divine mercy (especially as conceived by Calvinists).
mojo a magic power or magic spell.
esthetic aesthetic (philosophy) a philosophical theory as to what is beautiful; "he despised the esthetic of minimalism".
confucianism the teachings of Confucius emphasizing love for humanity; high value given to learning and to devotion to family (including ancestors); peace; justice; influenced the traditional culture of China.
environmentalism the philosophical doctrine that environment is more important than heredity in determining intellectual growth.
determinism (philosophy) a philosophical theory holding that all events are inevitable consequences of antecedent sufficient causes; often understood as denying the possibility of free will.
hereditarianism the philosophical doctrine that heredity is more important than environment in determining intellectual growth.
mentalism (philosophy) a doctrine that mind is the true reality and that objects exist only as aspects of the mind's awareness.
instrumentalism a system of pragmatic philosophy that considers idea to be instruments that should guide our actions and their value is measured by their success.
rationalism (philosophy) the doctrine that knowledge is acquired by reason without resort to experience.
sensualism sensationalism (philosophy) the ethical doctrine that feeling is the only criterion for what is good.
theurgy white magic performed with the help of beneficent spirits (as formerly practiced by Neoplatonists).
white_magic magic used only for good purposes.
skepticism scepticism agnosticism the disbelief in any claims of ultimate knowledge.
atheism a lack of belief in the existence of God or gods.
education knowledge acquired by learning and instruction; "it was clear that he had a very broad education".
traditional_knowledge lore knowledge gained through tradition or anecdote; "early peoples passed on plant and animal lore through legend".
scholarship learning learnedness erudition eruditeness encyclopedism encyclopaedism profound scholarly knowledge.
ignorance the lack of knowledge or education.
darkness dark an unenlightened state; "he was in the dark concerning their intentions"; "his lectures dispelled the darkness".
unknowingness unknowing nescience ignorantness ignorance (especially of orthodox beliefs).
rawness inexperience lack of experience and the knowledge and understanding derived from experience; "procedural inexperience created difficulties"; "their poor behavior was due to the rawness of the troops".
principle_of_parsimony ockham's_razor occam's_razor law_of_parsimony the principle that entities should not be multiplied needlessly; the simplest of two competing theories is to be preferred.
positivism logical_positivism the form of empiricism that bases all knowledge on perceptual experience (not on intuition or revelation).
consumerism the theory that an increasing consumption of goods is economically beneficial.
liberalism an economic theory advocating free competition and a self-regulating market.
metaknowledge knowledge about knowledge.
spherical_trigonometry (mathematics) the trigonometry of spherical triangles.
definite_integral the integral of a function over a definite interval.
set_theory the branch of pure mathematics that deals with the nature and relations of sets.
metamathematics the logical analysis of mathematical reasoning.
age_norm the average age at which particular performances are expected to appear.
outlier an extreme deviation from the mean.
poisson_distribution a theoretical distribution that is a good approximation to the binomial distribution when the probability is small and the number of trials is large.
multicollinearity a case of multiple regression in which the predictor variables are themselves highly correlated.
vital_statistics data relating to births and deaths and health and diseases and marriages.
first-order_correlation a partial correlation in which the effects of only one variable are removed (held constant).
coefficient_of_concordance a coefficient of agreement (concordance) between different sets of rank orderings of the same set of things.
macrobiotics the theory of promoting health and longevity by means of diet (especially whole beans and grains).
medical_science the science of dealing with the maintenance of health and the prevention and treatment of disease.
phrenology a now abandoned study of the shape of skull as indicative of the strengths of different faculties.
hygienics hygiene the science concerned with the prevention of illness and maintenance of health.
psychopharmacology the study of drugs that affect the mind.
psychotherapy psychotherapeutics mental_hygiene the branch of psychiatry concerned with psychological methods.
clinical_psychology the branch of psychology concerned with the treatment of abnormal mentation and behavior.
therapeutics branch of medicine concerned with the treatment of disease.
toxicology the branch of pharmacology that deals with the nature and effects and treatments of poisons.
enzymology the branch of biochemistry dealing with the chemical nature and biological activity of enzymes.
acoustics the study of the physical properties of sound.
uncertainty_principle indeterminacy_principle (quantum theory) the theory that it is impossible to measure both energy and time (or position and momentum) completely accurately at the same time.
mendelism mendelianism the theory of inheritance based on Mendel's laws.
neo-lamarckism a modern Lamarckian theory emphasizing the importance of environmental factors in genetic changes and retaining the notion of the inheritance of acquired characters.
topography precise detailed study of the surface features of a region.
psychopathology abnormal_psychology the branch of psychology concerned with abnormal behavior.
behaviouristic_psychology behaviourism behavioristic_psychology behaviorism an approach to psychology that emphasizes observable measurable behavior.
psychophysiology physiological_psychology neuropsychology the branch of psychology that is concerned with the physiological bases of psychological processes.
gestalt_psychology configurationism (psychology) a theory of psychology that emphasizes the importance of configurational properties.
realpolitik practical_politics politics based on practical rather than moral or ideological considerations.
performing_arts arts or skills that require public performance.
philosophy the rational investigation of questions about existence and knowledge and ethics.
moral_philosophy ethics the philosophical study of moral values and rules.
bioethics the branch of ethics that studies moral values in the biomedical sciences.
casuistry moral philosophy based on the application of general ethical principles to resolve moral dilemmas.
hedonism an ethical system that evaluates the pursuit of pleasure as the highest good.
esthetics aesthetics (art) the branch of philosophy dealing with beauty and taste (emphasizing the evaluative criteria that are applied to art); "traditional aesthetics assumed the existence of universal and timeless criteria of artistic value".
ontology the metaphysical study of the nature of being and existence.
ontology (computer science) a rigorous and exhaustive organization of some knowledge domain that is usually hierarchical and contains all the relevant entities and their relations.
cosmology the metaphysical study of the origin and nature of the universe.
quantification a limitation imposed on the variables of a proposition (as by the quantifiers `some' or `all' or `no').
deontic_logic the modal logic of obligation and permissibility.
epistemic_logic the modal logic of knowledge and uncertainty and ignorance.
modal_logic the logical study of necessity and possibility.
phenomenology a philosophical doctrine proposed by Edmund Husserl based on the study of human experience in which considerations of objective reality are not taken into account.
literary_criticism lit_crit the informed analysis and evaluation of literature.
theology divinity the rational and systematic study of religion and its influences and of the nature of religious truth.
theodicy the branch of theology that defends God's goodness and justice in the face of the existence of evil.
natural_theology a theology that holds that knowledge of God can be acquired by human reason without the aid of divine revelation.
teaching precept commandment a doctrine that is taught; "the teachings of religion"; "he believed all the Christian precepts".
antinomianism the theological doctrine that by faith and God's grace a Christian is freed from all laws (including the moral standards of the culture).
utilitarianism doctrine that the useful is the good; especially as elaborated by Jeremy Bentham and James Mill; the aim was said to be the greatest happiness for the greatest number.
arianism heretical doctrine taught by Arius that asserted the radical primacy of the Father over the Son.
boehmenism behmenism the mystical theological doctrine of Jakob Boehme that influenced the Quakers.
monophysitism a Christian heresy of the 5th and 6th centuries that challenged the orthodox definition of the two natures (human and divine) in Jesus and instead believed there was a single divine nature.
monothelitism the theological doctrine that Christ had only one will even though he had two natures (human and divine); condemned as heretical in the Third Council of Constantinople.
pelagianism the theological doctrine put forward by Pelagius which denied original sin and affirmed the ability of humans to be righteous; condemned as heresy by the Council of Ephesus in 431.
synergism the theological doctrine that salvation results from the interaction of human will and divine grace.
recognition an acceptance (as of a claim) as true and valid; "the recognition of the Rio Grande as a boundary between Mexico and the United States".
mosaic_culture a highly diverse culture; "the city's mosaic culture results in great diversity in the arts".
high_horse an attitude of arrogant superiority; "get off your high horse and admit you are wrong".
paternalism the attitude (of a person or a government) that subordinates should be controlled in a fatherly way for their own good.
tendency inclination disposition an attitude of mind especially one that favors one alternative over others; "he had an inclination to give up too easily"; "a tendency to be too strict".
call a special disposition (as if from a divine source) to pursue a particular course; "he was disappointed that he had not heard the Call".
understanding sympathy an inclination to support or be loyal to or to agree with an opinion; "his sympathies were always with the underdog"; "I knew I could count on his understanding".
propensity proclivity leaning a natural inclination; "he has a proclivity for exaggeration".
set bent a relatively permanent inclination to react in a particular way; "the set of his mind was obvious".
perseveration the tendency for a memory or idea to persist or recur without any apparent stimulus for it.
predisposition an inclination beforehand to interpret statements in a particular way.
preference predilection orientation a predisposition in favor of something; "a predilection for expensive cars"; "his sexual preferences"; "showed a Marxist orientation".
favour favor an inclination to approve; "that style is in favor this season".
ethnocentrism belief in the superiority of one's own ethnic group.
eurocentrism belief in the preeminence of Europe and the Europeans.
fairness fair-mindedness candour candor ability to make judgments free from discrimination or dishonesty.
tendentiousness an intentional and controversial bias.
tolerance willingness to recognize and respect the beliefs or practices of others.
broad-mindedness an inclination to tolerate or overlook opposing or shocking opinions or behavior.
intolerance unwillingness to recognize and respect differences in opinions or beliefs.
narrowness narrow-mindedness an inclination to criticize opposing opinions or shocking behavior.
pettiness narrowness of mind or ideas or views.
zero_tolerance extreme intolerance of antisocial behavior (usually by an uncompromising application of the law); "he urged zero tolerance for priests who abuse children sexually".
respect regard esteem an attitude of admiration or esteem; "she lost all respect for him".
estimation estimate the respect with which a person is held; "they had a high estimation of his ability".
reverence a reverent mental attitude.
sight a range of mental vision; "in his sight she could do no wrong".
orthodoxy a belief or orientation agreeing with conventional standards.
conventionality conformity with conventional thought and behavior.
legalism strict conformity to the letter of the law rather than its spirit.
reaction extreme conservatism in political or social matters; "the forces of reaction carried the election".
hawkishness any political orientation favoring aggressive policies.
pantheism (rare) worship that admits or tolerates all gods.
seventh-day_adventism Adventism that is strongly Protestant and observes Saturday as the Sabbath.
catharism albigensianism a Christian movement considered to be a medieval descendant of Manichaeism in southern France in the 12th and 13th centuries; characterized by dualism (asserted the coexistence of two mutually opposed principles, one good and one evil); was exterminated for heresy during the Inquisition.
arminianism 17th century theology (named after its founder Jacobus Arminius) that opposes the absolute predestinarianism of John Calvin and holds that human free will is compatible with God's sovereignty.
calvinism the theological system of John Calvin and his followers emphasizing omnipotence of God and salvation by grace alone.
methodism the religious beliefs and practices of Methodists characterized by concern with social welfare and public morals.
wesleyism wesleyanism evangelical principles taught by John Wesley.
pentecostalism the principles and practices of Pentecostal religious groups; characterized by religious excitement and talking in tongues.
presbyterianism the doctrines and practices of the Presbyterian Church: based in Calvinism.
judaism the monotheistic religion of the Jews having its spiritual and ethical principles embodied chiefly in the Torah and in the Talmud.
conservative_judaism beliefs and practices of Conservative Jews.
reform_judaism beliefs and practices of Reform Jews.
salafism salafi_movement a militant group of extremist Sunnis who believe themselves the only correct interpreters of the Koran and consider moderate Muslims to be infidels; seek to convert all Muslims and to insure that its own fundamentalist version of Islam will dominate the world.
shiism the branch of Islam that regards Ali as the legitimate successor to Mohammed and rejects the first three caliphs.
darsana (from the Sanskrit word for `to see') one of six orthodox philosophical systems or viewpoints on the nature of reality and the release from bondage to karma.
sivaism shivaism worship of Shiva one of the 3 chief gods of the Hindu pantheon.
vishnuism vaisnavism vaishnavism worship of Vishnu one of the 3 chief gods of the Hindu pantheon.
theravada_buddhism theravada one of two great schools of Buddhist doctrine emphasizing personal salvation through your own efforts; a conservative form of Buddhism that adheres to Pali scriptures and the non-theistic ideal of self purification to nirvana; the dominant religion of Sri Lanka (Ceylon) and Myanmar (Burma) and Thailand and Laos and Cambodia.
zoroastrianism mazdaism system of religion founded in Persia in the 6th century BC by Zoroaster; set forth in the Zend-Avesta; based on concept of struggle between light (good) and dark (evil).
wrinkle a clever method of doing something (especially something new and different).
band a range of frequencies between two limits.
lens (metaphor) a channel through which something can be seen or understood; "the writer is the lens through which history can be seen".
newspaper_column editorial column an article giving opinions or perspectives.
lead_story lead1 a news story of major importance.
atm asynchronous_transfer_mode a means of digital communications that is capable of very high speeds; suitable for transmission of images or voice or video as well as data; "ATM is used for both LAN and WAN".
freemail a service providing free email delivery in exchange for exposure to advertising.
reception quality or fidelity of a received broadcast.
usage the customary manner in which a language (or a form of a language) is spoken or written; "English usage"; "a usage borrowed from French".
homonym two words are homonyms if they are pronounced or spelled the same way but have different meanings.
quantifier logical_quantifier (logic) a word (such as `some' or `all' or `no') that binds the variables in a logical proposition.
existential_quantifier existential_operator a logical quantifier of a proposition that asserts the existence of at least one thing for which the proposition is true.
grammatical_case case1 nouns or pronouns or adjectives (often marked by inflection) related in some way to other words in a sentence.
superlative_degree superlative the superlative form of an adjective or adverb; "`fastest' is the superlative of the adjective `fast'"; "`least famous' is the superlative degree of the adjective `famous'"; "`most surely' is the superlative of the adverb `surely'".
defender_of_the_faith a title that Leo X bestowed on Henry VIII and later withdrew; parliament restored the title and it has been used by English sovereigns ever since.
don a Spanish courtesy title or form of address for men that is prefixed to the forename; "Don Roberto".
dona a Spanish courtesy title or form of address for a woman; "Dona Marguerita".
hakham a Hebrew title of respect for a wise and highly educated man.
reverend a title of respect for a clergyman.
senorita a Spanish title or form of address used to or of an unmarried girl or woman; similar to the English `Miss'.
very_reverend a title of respect for various ecclesiastical officials (as cathedral deans and canons and others).
baronetcy the title of a baron.
viscountcy the title of a viscount.
streamer banner a newspaper headline that runs across the full page.
copperplate a graceful style of handwriting based on the writing used on copperplate engravings.
uncial a style of orthography characterized by somewhat rounded capital letters; found especially in Greek and Latin manuscripts of the 4th to 8th centuries.
spelling forming words with letters according to the principles underlying accepted usage.
euphuism an elegant style of prose of the Elizabethan period; characterized by balance and antithesis and alliteration and extended similes with and allusions to nature and mythology.
roman_a_clef a novel in which actual persons and events are disguised as fictional characters.
bodice_ripper a romantic novel containing scenes in which the heroine is sexually violated.
parable fable apologue allegory a short moral story (often with animal characters).
dithyramb (ancient Greece) a passionate hymn (usually in honor of Dionysus).
rhapsody an epic poem adapted for recitation.
subdivision section a self-contained part of a larger composition (written or musical); "he always turns first to the business section"; "the history of this work is discussed in the next section".
paragraph one of several distinct subdivisions of a text intended to separate ideas; the beginning is usually marked by a new indented line.
penmanship chirography calligraphy beautiful handwriting.
copybook a book containing models of good penmanship; used in teaching penmanship.
etymological_dictionary a dictionary giving the historical origins of each word.
unabridged_dictionary unabridged a dictionary that has not been shortened by the omitting terms or definitions; a comprehensive dictionary.
oxford_english_dictionary oed o.e.d. an unabridged dictionary constructed on historical principles.
onomasticon a list of proper nouns naming persons or places.
grimoire a manual of black magic (for invoking spirits and demons).
linguistic_atlas dialect_atlas an atlas showing the distribution of distinctive linguistic features.
copy_editing putting something into a form suitable for a printer.
revelation_of_saint_john_the_divine revelation book_of_revelation apocalypse the last book of the New Testament; contains visionary descriptions of heaven and of conflicts between good and evil and of the end of the world; attributed to Saint John the Apostle.
american_standard_version american_revised_version a revised version of the King James Version.
revised_standard_version a revision of the American Standard Version.
hail_mary ave_maria a salutation to the Virgin Mary now used in prayers to her.
ii_esdras 2_esdras an Apocryphal book of angelic revelations.
wisdom_of_jesus_the_son_of_sirach sirach ecclesiasticus ben_sira an Apocryphal book mainly of maxims (resembling Proverbs in that respect).
aranyaka a treatise resembling a Brahmana but to be read or expounded by anchorites in the quiet of the forest.
upanishad a later sacred text of Hinduism of a mystical nature dealing with metaphysical questions; "the Vedanta philosophy developed from the pantheistic views of the Upanishads".
psalm any sacred song used to praise the deity.
brevet a document entitling a commissioned officer to hold a higher rank temporarily (but without higher pay).
credentials credential certification certificate a document attesting to the truth of certain stated facts.
royal_charter a charter granted by the sovereign (especially in Great Britain).
hnd higher_national_diploma a diploma given for vocational training that prepares the student for a career in a particular area; good students may progress to a course leading to a degree.
derivative_instrument derivative a financial instrument whose value is based on another security.
push-down_queue a queue in which the last item to go in is the first item to come out (LIFO).
blue_book a register of persons who are socially prominent.
joint_resolution a resolution passed by both houses of Congress which becomes legally binding when signed by the Chief Executive (or passed over the Chief Executive's veto).
statement financial_statement a document showing credits and debits.
voucher coupon a negotiable certificate that can be detached and redeemed as needed.
season_ticket commutation_ticket a ticket good for several trips or to attend a season of entertainments; sold at a reduced rate.
plane_ticket airplane_ticket a ticket good for a trip on an airplane.
pass3 a complimentary ticket; "the star got passes for his family".
train_ticket railroad_ticket a ticket good for a ride on a railroad train.
theatre_ticket theater_ticket a ticket good for admission to a theater.
bus_ticket a ticket good for a ride on a bus.
contract a binding agreement between two or more persons that is enforceable by law.
overvaluation overestimation overestimate overappraisal an appraisal that is too high.
credit_order bill-me_order an order that is received without payment; requires billing at a later date.
reorder a repeated order for the same merchandise; "he's the one who sends out all the new orders and reorders".
nullity something that is null (especially an enactment that has no legal validity).
riot_act a vigorous reprimand; "I read him the riot act".
reprieve a warrant granting postponement (usually to postpone the execution of the death sentence).
pardon amnesty a warrant granting release from punishment for an offense.
plea_of_insanity insanity_plea (criminal law) a plea in which the defendant claims innocence due to mental incompetence at the time.
sense_tagger a tagging program whose labels indicate the meanings of words or expressions.
virus computer_virus a software program capable of reproducing itself and usually capable of causing great harm to files or other programs on the same computer; "a true virus cannot spread to another computer without human assistance".
shareware software that is available free of charge; may be distributed for evaluation with a fee requested for additional features or a manual etc..
read something that is read; "the article was a very good read".
comic_book a magazine devoted to comic strips.
slick_magazine slick glossy a magazine printed on good quality paper.
word_sense word_meaning acceptation the accepted meaning of a word.
ambiguity an expression whose meaning cannot be determined from its context.
double_entendre an ambiguity with one interpretation that is indelicate.
overtone (usually plural) an ulterior implicit meaning or quality; "overtones of despair".
crux_of_the_matter crux the most important point.
piffle fiddle-faddle balderdash trivial nonsense.
crock nonsense; foolish talk; "that's a crock".
rhetoric palaver hot_air empty_words empty_talk loud and confused and empty talk; "mere rhetoric".
wish-wash trumpery tripe trash rubbish folderol codswallop applesauce nonsensical talk or writing.
pap pablum worthless or oversimplified ideas.
garbage drivel a worthless message.
collage_film a movie that juxtaposes different kinds of footage.
short_subject a brief film; often shown prior to showing the feature.
kamasutra (Hinduism) an ancient Sanskrit text giving rules for sensuous and sensual pleasure and love and marriage in accordance with Hindu law.
love_letter billet_doux a personal letter to a loved one expressing affection.
salutation greeting (usually plural) an acknowledgment or expression of good will (especially on meeting).
well-wishing an expression of good will from one person to another; "much hand-shaking and well-wishing".
wish regard compliments (usually plural) a polite expression of desire for someone's welfare; "give him my kind regards"; "my best wishes".
response reception the manner in which something is greeted; "she did not expect the cold reception she received from her superiors".
hail enthusiastic greeting.
welcome a greeting or reception; "the proposal got a warm welcome".
hospitality cordial_reception kindness in welcoming guests or strangers.
glad_hand a warm welcome; may be insincere.
mrd machine_readable_dictionary electronic_dictionary a machine-readable version of a standard dictionary; organized alphabetically.
price_level price_index an index that traces the relative changes in the price of an individual good (or a market basket of goods) over time.
news informal information of any kind that is not previously known to someone; "it was news to me".
good_word good news.
token something serving as a sign of something else.
footprint a trace suggesting that something was once present or felt or otherwise important; "the footprints of an earlier civilization".
proof a formal series of statements showing that if one thing is true something else necessarily follows from it.
mathematical_proof proof of a mathematical theorem.
logical_proof proof of a logical theorem.
testament strong evidence for something; "his easy victory was a testament to his skill".
confirmation information that confirms or verifies.
wind tip steer lead0 hint confidential_information an indication of potential opportunity; "he got a tip on the stock market"; "a good lead for a job".
insider_information important information about the plans or condition of a corporation that has not been released to the public; use for personal profit is illegal.
moral_principle the principle that conduct should be moral.
golden_rule any important rule; "the golden rule of teaching is to be clear".
categorical_imperative the moral principle that behavior should be determined by duty.
zero-tolerance_policy any policy that allows no exception; "a zero-tolerance policy toward pedophile priests".
ethical_code ethic a system of principles governing morality and acceptable conduct.
etiquette rules governing socially acceptable behavior.
punctilio a fine point of etiquette or petty formality.
dress_code a set of rules specifying the correct manner of dress while on the premises of the institution (or specifying what manner of dress is prohibited).
sanitary_code health_code set of standards established and enforced by government for health requirements as in plumbing etc.
double_standard an ethical or moral code that applies more strictly to one group than to another.
recommendation something (as a course of action) that is recommended as advisable.
indication something (as a course of action) that is indicated as expedient or necessary; "there were indications that it was time to leave".
qabalah qabala kabbalah kabbala kabala cabbalah cabbala cabala an esoteric or occult matter resembling the Kabbalah that is traditionally secret.
copy material suitable for a journalistic account; "catastrophes make good copy".
reading_program a program designed to teach literacy skills.
commendation approval a message expressing a favorable opinion; "words of approval seldom passed his lips".
warrant sanction indorsement imprimatur endorsement countenance formal and explicit approval; "a Democrat usually gets the union's endorsement".
recognition credit approval; "give her recognition for trying"; "he was given credit for his work"; "give her credit for trying".
remembrance memorial commemoration a recognition of meritorious service.
standing_ovation ovation enthusiastic recognition (especially one accompanied by loud applause).
salute salutation an act of honor or courteous recognition; "a musical salute to the composer on his birthday".
permission approval to do something; "he asked permission to leave".
plaudits plaudit eclat acclamation acclaim enthusiastic approval; "the book met with modest acclaim"; "he acknowledged the plaudits of the crowd"; "they gave him more eclat than he really deserved".
hand_clapping clapping applause a demonstration of approval by clapping the hands together.
cheer a cry or shout of approval.
bravo a cry of approval as from an audience at the end of great performance.
praise kudos extolment congratulations an expression of approval and commendation; "he always appreciated praise for his work".
hallelujah a shout or song of praise to God.
rave an extravagantly enthusiastic review; "he gave it a rave".
superlative an exaggerated expression (usually of praise); "the critics lavished superlatives on it".
puff exaggerated praise (as for promotional purposes).
compliment a remark (or act) expressing praise and admiration.
trade-last a compliment that I heard about you that I offer to trade for a compliment you have heard about me.
flattery excessive or insincere praise.
puffery a flattering commendation (especially when used for promotional purposes).
laurels honour honor award accolade a tangible symbol signifying approval or distinction; "an award for bravery".
aliyah (Judaism) the honor of being called up to the reading desk in the synagogue to read from the Torah; "he was called on for an aliyah".
tribute testimonial something given or done as an expression of esteem.
first-class_honours_degree first an honours degree of the highest class.
doctorate doctor's_degree one of the highest earned academic degrees conferred by a university.
edd doctor_of_education ded a doctor's degree in education.
doctor_of_osteopathy do doctor's degree in osteopathy.
phd ph.d. a doctorate usually based on at least 3 years graduate study and a dissertation; the highest degree awarded graduate study.
dph doctor_of_public_health a doctor's degree in preventive medicine.
honoris_causa honorary_degree a degree conferred to honor the recipient.
seal_of_approval seal cachet an indication of approved or superior status.
commendation citation an official award (as for bravery or service) usually given as formal public statement.
mention honorable_mention an official recognition of merit; "although he didn't win the prize he did get special mention".
distinguished_service_cross a United States Army decoration for extraordinary heroism against an armed enemy.
navy_cross a United States Navy decoration for extraordinary heroism against an armed enemy.
brickbat blunt criticism.
counterblast a vigorous and unrestrained response; "her tirade provoked a counterblast from her husband".
what_for a strong reprimand.
monition admonition admonishment a firm rebuke.
respects (often used with `pay') a formal expression of esteem; "he paid his respects to the mayor".
courtesy a courteous or respectful or considerate remark.
sour_grapes disparagement of something that is unattainable.
patronage disdain condescension a communication that indicates lack of respect by patronizing the recipient.
smear_word an epithet that can be used to smear someone's reputation; "he used the smear word `communist' for everyone who disagreed with him".
stinger cut a remark capable of wounding mentally; "the unkindest cut of all".
gospel_truth gospel an unquestionable truth; "his word was gospel".
antinomy a contradiction between two statements that seem equally reasonable.
neural_network neural_net computer architecture in which processors are connected in a manner suggestive of connections between neurons; can learn by trial and error.
averment asseveration assertion a declaration that is made emphatically (as if no supporting evidence were necessary).
claim an assertion of a right (as to money or property); "his claim asked for damages".
claim an assertion that something is true or factual; "his claim that he was innocent"; "evidence contradicted the government's claims".
allegement allegation statements affirming or denying certain matters of fact that you are prepared to prove.
reassertion reaffirmation renewed affirmation.
testimony an assertion offering firsthand authentication of a fact; "according to his own testimony he can't do it".
protestation a strong declaration of protest.
commination a threat of divine punishment or vengeance.
simplification an explanation that omits superfluous details and reduces complexity.
value_statement a statement of the desirability of something.
moralizing moralization moralisation indulgence in moral pronouncements; the exposition (often superficially) of a particular moral code; "his constant moralizing drove me mad".
preachification moralization delivered tediously in a preachy manner.
prophecy divination a prediction uttered under divine inspiration.
oracle a prophecy (usually obscure or allegorical) revealed by a priest or priestess; believed to be infallible.
theorem a proposition deducible from basic postulates.
categoreme categorem a categorematic expression; a term capable of standing alone as the subject or predicate of a logical proposition; "names are called categorems".
ratiocination conclusion the proposition arrived at by logical reasoning (such as the proposition that must follow from the major and minor premises of a syllogism).
postulate posit (logic) a proposition that is accepted as true in order to provide a basis for logical reasoning.
specious_argument an argument that appears good at first view but is really fallacious.
vicious_circle an argument that assumes that which is to be proved.
song_and_dance fairytale fairy_tale fairy_story cock-and-bull_story an interesting but highly implausible story; often told as an excuse.
white_lie an unimportant lie (especially one told to be tactful or polite).
overstatement magnification exaggeration making to seem more important than it really is.
bluff pretense that your position is stronger than it really is; "his bluff succeeded in getting him accepted".
lip_service hypocrisy an expression of agreement that is not supported by real conviction.
cautious_statement a statement made with careful qualifications.
reflexion reflection observation a remark expressing careful consideration.
wisecrack sally quip crack witty remark.
cheap_shot an unnecessarily aggressive and unfair remark directed at a defenseless person.
stopper conversation_stopper a remark to which there is no polite conversational reply.
gentlemen's_agreement a personal agreement based on honor and not legally binding.
sentimentalism the excessive expression of tender feelings, nostalgia, or sadness in any form.
mot bon_mot a clever remark.
laugh joke jest jape gag a humorous anecdote or remark intended to provoke laughter; "he told a very funny joke"; "he knows a million gags"; "thanks for the laugh"; "he laughed unpleasantly at his own jest"; "even a schoolboy's jape is supposed to have some ascertainable point".
dirty_story dirty_joke blue_story blue_joke an indelicate joke.
waggishness waggery waggish behavior.
ribaldry ribald humor.
topper an exceedingly good witticism that surpasses all that have gone before.
divination successful conjecture by unusual insight or good luck.
teaser puzzler puzzle mystifier a particularly baffling problem that is said to have a correct solution; "he loved to solve chessmate puzzles"; "that's a real puzzler".
koan a paradoxical anecdote or a riddle that has no solution; used in Zen Buddhism to show the inadequacy of logical reasoning.
ahimsa a Buddhist and Hindu and especially Jainist doctrine holding that all forms of life are sacred and urging the avoidance of violence.
ecumenism ecumenicism ecumenicalism (Christianity) the doctrine of the ecumenical movement that promotes cooperation and better understanding among different religious denominations: aimed at universal Christian unity.
storm_cone a canvas cone hoisted to warn of high winds.
time_signal a signal (especially electronic or by radio) indicating the precisely correct time.
signalization signalisation a conspicuous indication.
pointing_out indication by demonstration.
prefix_notation polish_notation lukasiewicz_notation a parenthesis-free notation for forming mathematical expressions in which each operator precedes its operands.
suffix_notation reverse_polish_notation postfix_notation a parenthesis-free notation for forming mathematical expressions in which each operator follows its operands.
structural_formula an expanded molecular formula showing the arrangement of atoms within the molecule.
tick check_mark check a mark indicating that something has been noted or completed etc.; "as he called the role he put a check mark by each student's name".
circumflex a diacritical mark (^) placed above a vowel in some languages to indicate a special phonetic quality.
type_family a complete set of type suitable for printing text.
block_letter block_capital a plain hand-drawn letter.
radical a character conveying the lexical meaning of a logogram.
major_mode major_key a key whose harmony is based on the major scale.
scale_of_c_major c_major_scale c_major (music) the major scale having no sharps or flats.
pennant a flag longer than it is wide (and often tapering).
smiling smile grinning grin a facial expression characterized by turning up the corners of the mouth; usually shows pleasure or amusement.
demonstration demo a visual presentation showing how something works; "the lecture was accompanied by dramatic demonstrations"; "the lecturer shot off a pistol as a demonstration of the startle response".
illustration exemplification showing by example.
acting_out (psychiatry) the display of previously inhibited emotions (often in actions rather than words); considered to be healthy and therapeutic.
array an impressive display; "it was a bewildering array of books"; "his tools were in an orderly array on the basement wall".
spectacle something or someone seen (especially a notable or unusual sight); "the tragic spectacle of cripples trying to escape".
bravado bluster a swaggering show of courage.
exhibitionism extravagant and conspicuous behavior intended to attract attention to yourself.
ritz ostentatious display of elegance; "they put on the ritz".
flourish a showy gesture; "she entered with a great flourish".
public_presentation performance a dramatic or musical entertainment; "they listened to ten different performances"; "the play ran for 100 performances"; "the frequent performances of the symphony testify to its popularity".
benefit_concert a concert given for the benefit of some charitable cause.
pianism performance by or technique of a pianist; "a program of pianism".
rendition rendering a performance of a musical composition or a dramatic role etc.; "they heard a live rendition of three pieces by Schubert".
theatrical_performance theatrical representation histrionics a performance of a play.
matinee a theatrical performance held during the daytime (especially in the afternoon).
spectacular a lavishly produced performance; "they put on a Christmas spectacular".
stratified_language a language that cannot be used as its own metalanguage.
upgrade software that provides better performance than an earlier version did.
received_pronunciation the approved pronunciation of British English; originally based on the King's English as spoken at public schools and at Oxford and Cambridge Universities (and widely accepted elsewhere in Britain); until recently it was the pronunciation of English used in British broadcasting.
anglian one of the major dialects of Old English.
kentish jutish one of the major dialects of Old English.
old_high_german High German prior to 1200.
middle_high_german High German from 1100 to 1500.
illustration artwork that helps make something clear or attractive.
plot a chart or map showing the movements or progress of an object.
organization_chart a chart showing the lines of responsibility between departments of a large organization.
color_chart a chart displaying colors.
coup_de_theatre a highly successful theatrical production.
fragment an incomplete piece; "fragments of a play".
outburst gush effusion ebullition blowup an unrestrained expression of emotion.
flare a sudden outburst of emotion; "she felt a flare of delight"; "she could not control her flare of rage".
closet_drama drama more suitable for reading that for performing.
black_comedy comedy that uses black humor.
travesty farce_comedy farce a comedy characterized by broad satire and improbable situations.
high_comedy a sophisticated comedy; often satirizing genteel society.
low_comedy a comedy characterized by slapstick and burlesque.
slapstick a boisterous comedy with chases and collisions and practical jokes.
burlesque a theatrical entertainment of broad and earthy humor; consists of comic skits and short turns (and sometimes striptease).
play a theatrical performance of a drama; "the play lasted two hours".
minstrel_show a variety show in which the performers are made up in blackface.
serious_music classical_music classical traditional genre of music conforming to an established form and appealing to critical interest and developed musical taste.
theme musical_theme melodic_theme idea (music) melodic subject of a musical composition; "the theme is announced in the first measures"; "the accompanist picked up the idea and elaborated it".
hallel (Judaism) a chant of praise (Psalms 113 through 118) used at Passover and Shabuoth and Sukkoth and Hanukkah and Rosh Hodesh.
hare_krishna a chant to the Hindu god Krishna.
toccata a baroque musical composition (usually for a keyboard instrument) with full chords and rapid elaborate runs in a rhythmically free style.
sonatina a short and simple sonata.
blue_note a flattened third or seventh.
love_song love-song a song about love or expressing love for another person.
love_lyric the lyric of a love song.
torch_song a popular song concerned with disappointment in love.
shivaree chivaree charivari callithump callathump belling a noisy mock serenade (made by banging pans and kettles) to a newly married couple.
techno a style of fast heavy electronic dance music usually without vocals.
military_music military_march martial_music brisk marching music suitable for troops marching in a military parade.
hot_jazz jazz that is emotionally charged and intense and marked by strong rhythms and improvisation.
conceit an artistic device or effect; "the architect's brilliant conceit was to build the house around the tree".
doctorspeak medical jargon.
flatness a want of animation or brilliance; "the almost self-conscious flatness of Hemingway's style".
honorific an expression of respect; "the Japanese use many honorifics".
pathos a style that has the power to evoke feelings.
rhetoric using language effectively to please or persuade.
wording verbiage phrasing phraseology diction choice_of_words the manner in which something is expressed in words; "use concise military verbiage"- G.S.Patton.
tongue a manner of speaking; "he spoke with a thick tongue"; "she has a glib tongue".
stress emphasis accent the relative prominence of a syllable or musical note (especially with regard to stress or pitch); "he put the stress on the wrong syllable".
technobabble technical jargon from computing and other high-tech subjects.
brevity the use of brief expressions.
eye_rhyme an imperfect rhyme (e.g., `love' and `move').
asyndeton the omission of conjunctions where they would normally be used.
apophasis mentioning something by saying it will not be mentioned.
preterition paralipsis paralepsis paraleipsis suggesting by deliberately concise treatment that much of significance is omitted.
polysyndeton using several conjunctions in close succession, especially where some might be omitted (as in `he ran and jumped and laughed for joy').
wellerism a comparison comprising a well-known quotation followed by a facetious sequel.
conceit an elaborate poetic image or a far-fetched comparison of very dissimilar things.
hyperbole exaggeration extravagant exaggeration.
oxymoron conjoining contradictory terms (as in `deafening silence').
ablaut a vowel whose quality or length is changed to indicate linguistic distinctions (such as sing sang sung song).
grade gradation a degree of ablaut.
sibilant_consonant sibilant a consonant characterized by a hissing sound (like s or sh).
yell cry a loud utterance of emotion (especially when inarticulate); "a cry of rage"; "a yell of pain".
hosanna a cry of praise or adoration (to God).
shrieking shriek screeching screech screaming scream sharp piercing cry; "her screaming attracted the neighbors".
snort snigger snicker a disrespectful laugh.
titter a nervous restrained laugh.
pronunciation the manner in which someone utters a word; "they are always correcting my pronunciation".
speech_production speaking the utterance of intelligible speech.
duologue dialogue dialog a conversation between two persons.
heart-to-heart an intimate talk in private; "he took me aside for a little heart-to-heart".
wind nothingness malarky malarkey jazz idle_words empty rhetoric or insincere or exaggerated talk; "that's a lot of wind"; "don't give me any of that jazz".
sweet_nothings honeyed_words inconsequential expressions of affection; "he whispered sweet nothings into her ear".
direct_quotation direct_discourse a report of the exact words used in a discourse (e.g., "he said `I am a fool'").
felicitation congratulation (usually plural) an expression of pleasure at the success or good fortune of another; "I sent them my sincere congratulations on their marriage".
interview consultation audience a conference (usually with someone important); "he had a consultation with the judge"; "he requested an audience with the king".
dollar_diplomacy diplomacy influenced by economic considerations.
maxim axiom a saying that is widely accepted on its own merits.
gnome a short pithy saying expressing a general truth.
moralism a moral maxim.
quip epigram a witty saying.
platitude commonplace cliche bromide banality a trite or obvious remark.
truism an obvious truth.
sumpsimus a correct expression that takes the place of a popular but incorrect expression; "he preferred his erroneous but pleasing mumpsimus to the correct sumpsimus".
introduction a new proposal; "they resisted the introduction of impractical alternatives".
directive a pronouncement encouraging or banning some activity; "the boss loves to send us directives".
disambiguation clarification that follows from the removal of ambiguity.
lexical_disambiguation disambiguation of the sense of a polysemantic word.
embroidery embellishment elaboration of an interpretation by the use of decorative (sometimes fictitious) detail; "the mystery has been heightened by many embellishments in subsequent retellings".
literal_interpretation an interpretation based on the exact wording.
reading a particular interpretation or performance; "on that reading it was an insult"; "he was famous for his reading of Mozart".
popularization popularisation an interpretation that easily understandable and acceptable.
firestorm an outburst of controversy; "the incident triggered a political firestorm".
tilt disputation disceptation controversy contestation contention argument arguing a contentious speech act; a dispute where there is strong disagreement; "they were involved in a violent argument".
polemic a controversy (especially over a belief or dogma).
bust-up a serious quarrel (especially one that ends a friendship).
adjuration a solemn and earnest appeal to someone to do something.
demagogy demagoguery impassioned appeals to the prejudices and emotions of the populace.
jingoism flag_waving an appeal intended to arouse patriotic emotions.
solicitation an entreaty addressed to someone of superior status; "a solicitation to the king for relief".
suit a petition or appeal made to a person of superior status or rank.
prayer petition orison reverent petition to a deity.
purism scrupulous or exaggerated insistence on purity or correctness (especially in language); "linguistic purisms".
challenge questioning a statement and demanding an explanation; "his challenge of the assumption that Japan is still our enemy".
job_interview employment_interview an interview to determine whether an applicant is suitable for a position of employment.
affirmative a reply of affirmation; "he answered in the affirmative".
yes an affirmative; "I was hoping for a yes".
yea an affirmative; "The yeas have it".
double_negative an affirmative constructed from two negatives; "A not unwelcome outcome".
caption taking exception; especially a quibble based on a captious argument; "a mere caption unworthy of a reply".
pet_peeve an opportunity for complaint that is seldom missed; "grammatical mistakes are his pet peeve".
histrionics a deliberate display of emotion for effect.
discovery something that is discovered.
unmasking expose the exposure of an impostor or a fraud; "he published an expose of the graft and corruption in city government".
admission an acknowledgment of the truth of something.
sop a concession given to mollify or placate; "the offer was a sop to my feelings".
wage_concession an agreement to raise wages.
sob_stuff sob_story a sentimental story (or drama) of personal distress; designed to arouse sympathy.
oath a solemn promise, usually invoking a divine witness, regarding your future acts or behavior; "they took an oath of allegiance".
bayat an oath of allegiance to an emir.
clean_bill_of_health an assurance that someone is healthy or something is in good condition; "the doctor gave him a clean bill of health".
troth plight a solemn pledge of fidelity.
ringing the giving of a ring as a token of engagement.
thanks an acknowledgment of appreciation.
vaporing line-shooting gasconade crowing crow bragging brag an instance of boastful talk; "his brag is worse than his fight"; "whenever he won we were exposed to his gasconade".
vaunt extravagant self-praise.
numeration naming numbers.
specification naming explicitly.
explanation the act of explaining; making something plain or intelligible; "I heard his explanation of the accident".
grievance an allegation that something imposes an illegal obligation or denies some legal right or causes injustice.
indictment an accusation of wrongdoing; "the book is an indictment of modern philosophy".
implication an accusation that brings into intimate and usually incriminating connection.
dithyramb a wildly enthusiastic speech or piece of writing.
peroration a flowery and highly rhetorical oration.
public_debate disputation debate the formal presentation of a stated proposition and the opposition to it (usually followed by a vote).
ranting rant harangue a loud bombastic declamation expressed with strong emotion.
raving declaiming wildly; "the raving of maniacs".
salutatory_oration salutatory_address salutatory an opening or welcoming statement (especially one delivered at graduation exercises).
preachment homily a sermon on a moral or religious topic.
buildup highly favorable publicity and praise; "his letter of recommendation gave her a terrific buildup".
plug hype hoopla ballyhoo blatant or sensational promotion.
teaser an advertisement that offers something free in order to arouse customers' interest.
fostering fosterage encouragement; aiding the development of something.
provocation incitement needed encouragement; "the result was a provocation of vigorous investigation".
subornation underhandedly or improperly inducing someone to do something improper or unlawful.
vote_of_confidence an expression of approval and encouragement; "they gave the chairman a vote of confidence".
prohibition refusal to approve or assent to.
thought_transference telepathy apparent communication from one mind to another without using sensory perceptions.
landmark a mark showing the boundary of a piece of land.
indicator a signal for attracting attention.
cordon cord or ribbon worn as an insignia of honor or rank.
cordon_bleu blue_ribbon an honor or award gained for excellence.
emmy an annual award by the Academy of Television Arts and Sciences for outstanding achievements in television.
stripe a piece of braid, usually on the sleeve, indicating military rank or length of service.
name_tag a tag showing the name of the person who wears it.
curtsy curtsey bending the knees; a gesture of respect made by women.
genuflexion genuflection the act of bending the knees in worship or reverence.
zinger a striking or amusing or caustic remark; "he always greeted me with a new zinger"; "she tried to think of some killer of an argument, a real zinger that would disarm all opposition".
appalling an experience that appalls; "is it better to view the appalling or merely hear of it?".
auspice a favorable omen.
good_time blast a highly pleasurable or exciting experience; "we had a good time at the party"; "celebrating after the game was a blast".
near-death_experience the experience of being close to death but surviving.
trip head_trip an exciting or stimulating experience.
treat an occurrence that causes special pleasure or delight.
miracle any amazing or wonderful occurrence.
wonder marvel something that causes feelings of wonder; "the wonders of modern science".
dramatic_event drama an episode that is turbulent or highly emotional.
square_deal fair_deal fair treatment.
raw_deal unfair treatment.
corollary a practical consequence that follows naturally; "blind jealousy is a frequent corollary of passionate love".
deserts comeuppance comeupance an outcome (good or bad) that is well deserved.
wages reward payoff a recompense for worthy acts or retribution for wrongdoing; "the wages of sin is death"; "virtue is its own reward".
coup_de_theatre a dramatic surprise.
peripety peripetia peripeteia a sudden and unexpected change of fortune or reverse of circumstances (especially in a literary work); "a peripeteia swiftly turns a routine sequence of events into a story worth telling".
near_miss an accidental collision that is narrowly avoided.
scandal outrage a disgraceful event.
idyll an episode of such pastoral or romantic charm as to qualify as the subject of a poetic idyll.
cause_celebre an incident that attracts great public attention.
mortification humiliation an instance in which you are caused to lose your prestige or self-respect; "he had to undergo one humiliation after another".
happy_chance good_luck break an unexpected piece of good luck; "he finally got his big break".
flame-out a complete or conspicuous failure; "the spectacular flame-out of the company's stock cost many people their life savings".
success an event that accomplishes its intended purpose; "let's call heads a success and tails a failure"; "the election was a remarkable success for the Whigs".
barnburner an impressively successful event; "the rock concert was a real barnburner".
godspeed a successful journey; "they wished him Godspeed".
materialization materialisation manifestation an appearance in bodily form (as of a disembodied spirit).
manifestation a clear appearance; "a manifestation of great emotion".
epiphany a divine manifestation.
word_of_god a manifestation of the mind and will of God.
rise a growth in strength or number or importance.
running_start flying_start a quick and auspicious beginning.
rise procession emanation (theology) the origination of the Holy Spirit at Pentecost; "the emanation of the Holy Spirit"; "the rising of the Holy Ghost"; "the doctrine of the procession of the Holy Spirit from the Father and the Son".
etiology aetiology the cause of a disease.
unknown_quantity a factor in a given situation whose bearing and importance is not apparent; "I don't know what the new man will do; he's still an unknown quantity".
opening_night opening curtain_raising the first performance (as of a theatrical production); "the opening received good critical reviews".
disintegration annihilation total destruction; "bomb tests resulted in the annihilation of the atoll".
obliteration eradication the complete destruction of every trace of something.
extinction extermination complete annihilation; "they think a meteor cause the extinction of the dinosaurs".
finish the downfall of someone (as of persons on one side of a conflict); "booze will be the finish of him"; "it was a fight to the finish".
vicissitude a variation in circumstances or fortune at different times in your life or in the development of something; "the project was subject to the usual vicissitudes of exploratory research".
win a victory (as in a race or other competition); "he was happy to get the win".
relief moderation easing a change for the better.
improvement betterment advance a change for the better; progress in development.
transmutation transformation shift a qualitative change.
sea_change a profound transformation.
transmission infection contagion an incident in which an infectious disease is transmitted.
levitation movement upward in virtue of lightness.
flop fizzle bust a complete failure; "the play was a dismal flop".
lunar_eclipse the earth interrupts light shining on the moon.
partial_eclipse an eclipse in which the eclipsed body is only partially obscured.
fitting adjustment accommodation making or becoming suitable; adjusting to circumstances.
blend an occurrence of thorough mixing.
bark a noise resembling the bark of a dog.
honk the cry of a goose (or any sound resembling this).
tap rap pat the sound made by a gentle blow.
squeal a high-pitched howl.
tremolo vocal vibrato especially an excessive or poorly controlled one.
highwater high_water high_tide the tide when the water is highest.
neap_tide neap a less than average tide occurring at the first and third quarters of the moon.
springtide a greater than average tide occurring during the new and full moons.
big_bang (cosmology) the cosmic explosion that is hypothesized to have marked the origin of the universe.
smash knock belt bash bang a vigorous blow; "the sudden knock floored him"; "he took a bash right in his face"; "he got a bang on the head".
explosion a sudden great increase; "the population explosion"; "the information explosion".
fall_of_man (Judeo-Christian mythology) when Adam and Eve ate of the fruit of the tree of knowledge of good and evil in the Garden of Eden, God punished them by driving them out of the Garden of Eden and into the world where they would be subject to sickness and pain and eventual death.
reality_check an occasion on which one is reminded of the nature of things in the real world; "this program is intended as a reality check for CEOs"; "after all those elaborate productions, I felt in need of a reality check".
fading_away gradually diminishing in brightness or loudness or strength.
phenomenon a remarkable development.
revolution a drastic and far-reaching change in ways of thinking and behaving; "the industrial revolution was also a cultural revolution".
strengthening becoming stronger.
fall downfall a sudden decline in strength or number or importance; "the fall of the House of Hapsburg".
warping warp a moral or mental distortion.
thaw a relaxation or slackening of tensions or reserve; becoming less hostile; "the thaw between the United States and Russia has led to increased cooperation in world affairs".
jolly a happy party.
circumstance formal ceremony about important occasions; "pomp and circumstance".
rededication a new dedication; "the rededication of the Temple of Jerusalem".
memorialization memorialisation commemoration a ceremony to honor the memory of someone or something.
formality formalities a requirement of etiquette or custom; "a mere formality".
contest competition an occasion on which a winner is selected from among two or more contestants.
freestyle a race (as in swimming) in which each contestant has a free choice of the style to use.
heat a preliminary race in which the winner advances to a more important race.
high_jump a competition that involves jumping as high as possible over a horizontal bar.
race any competition; "the race for the presidency".
victory triumph a successful ending of a struggle or contest; "a narrow victory"; "the general always gets credit for his army's victory"; "clinched a victory"; "convincing victory"; "the agreement was a triumph for common sense".
last_laugh ultimate success achieved after a near failure (inspired by the saying `he laughs best who laughs last'); "we had the last laugh after the votes were counted".
checkmate complete victory.
waltz walk-in an assured victory (especially in an election).
windfall manna_from_heaven gravy gold_rush godsend bunce boom bonanza a sudden happening that brings good fortune (as a sudden opportunity to make money); "the demand for testing has created a boom for those unregulated laboratories where boxes of specimen jars are processed like an assembly line".
spike a sharp rise followed by a sharp decline; "the seismograph showed a sharp spike in response to the temblor".
emotion any strong feeling.
passionateness passion a strong feeling or emotion.
infatuation a foolish and usually extravagant passion or love or admiration.
fire fervour fervor fervidness fervency ardour ardor feelings of great warmth and intensity; "he spoke with great ardor".
inferiority_complex a sense of personal inferiority arising from conflict between the desire to be noticed and the fear of being humiliated.
listlessness lassitude languor a feeling of lack of interest or energy.
dream aspiration ambition a cherished desire; "his ambition is to own his own business".
emulation ambition to equal or excel.
temptation the desire to have or do something that you know you should avoid; "he felt the temptation and his will power weakened".
sweet_tooth a strong appetite for sweet food.
addiction an abnormally strong craving.
wishing wish want a specific feeling of desire; "he got his wish"; "he was above all wishing and desire".
sexual_desire physical_attraction eros concupiscence a desire for sexual intimacy.
sexual_love love erotic_love a deep feeling of sexual desire and attraction; "their love left them indifferent to their surroundings"; "she was his first love".
aphrodisia a desire for heterosexual intimacy.
passion a feeling of strong sexual desire.
sensualness sensuality sensualism desire for sensual pleasures.
sexiness erotism eroticism amorousness amativeness the arousal of feelings of sexual desire.
fetish a form of sexual desire in which gratification depends to an abnormal degree on some object or item of clothing or part of the body; "common male fetishes are breasts, legs, hair, shoes, and underwear".
lustfulness lust lecherousness a strong sexual desire.
nymphomania abnormally intense sexual desire in women.
satyriasis abnormally intense sexual desire in men.
the_hots intense sexual desire.
pruriency prurience lubricity lasciviousness carnality feeling morbid sexual desire or a propensity to lewdness.
enjoyment the pleasure felt when having a good time.
joie_de_vivre a keen enjoyment of living.
zestfulness zest relish gusto vigorous and enthusiastic enjoyment.
pleasantness the feeling caused by agreeable stimuli; one pole of a continuum of states of feeling.
afterglow the pleasure of remembering some pleasant event; "he basked in the afterglow of his victory".
cold_comfort very limited consolation or empathy; "he told me that time heals all wounds but that was cold comfort to me".
relief assuagement alleviation the feeling that comes when something burdensome is removed or reduced; "as he heard the news he was suddenly flooded with relief".
liking a feeling of pleasure and enjoyment; "I've always had a liking for reading"; "she developed a liking for gin".
fascination enthrallment enchantment captivation a feeling of great liking for something wonderful and unusual.
taste preference predilection penchant a strong liking; "my own preference is for good literature"; "the Irish have a penchant for blarney".
inclination that toward which you are inclined to feel a liking; "her inclination is for classical music".
tendency propensity leaning an inclination to do something; "he felt leanings toward frivolity".
friendliness a feeling of liking for another person; enjoyment in their company.
approval a feeling of liking something or someone good; "although she fussed at them, she secretly viewed all her children with approval".
favour favor a feeling of favorable regard.
approbation official approval.
esteem admiration a feeling of delighted approval and liking.
hero_worship admiration for great men (or their memory).
philhellenism admiration for Greece and the Greeks and Greek customs.
worship adoration a feeling of profound love and admiration.
concern a feeling of sympathy for someone or something; "She felt strong concern for those less fortunate".
tenderness softheartedness a feeling of concern for the welfare of someone (especially someone defenseless).
embarrassment the shame you feel when your inadequacy or guilt is made public.
mortification humiliation chagrin strong feelings of embarrassment.
pridefulness pride a feeling of self-respect and personal worth.
self-importance egotism ego an inflated feeling of pride in your superiority to others.
wonderment wonder admiration the feeling aroused by something strange and surprising.
awe an overwhelming feeling of wonder or admiration; "he stared over the edge with a feeling of awe".
surprise the astonishment you feel when something totally unexpected happens to you.
buck_fever nervous excitement of an inexperienced hunter.
hope a specific instance of feeling hopeful; "it revived their hope of winning the pennant".
playfulness gaiety a festive merry feeling.
sincerity seriousness earnestness an earnest and sincere feeling.
feelings emotional or moral sensitivity (especially in relation to personal principles or dignity); "the remark hurt his feelings".
impatience a restless desire for change and excitement.
stir emotional agitation and excitement.
electricity keen and shared excitement; "the stage crackled with electricity whenever she was on it".
sensation a general feeling of excitement and heightened interest; "anticipation produced in me a sensation somewhere between hope and fear".
imperturbableness imperturbability coolness calm and unruffled self-assurance; "he performed with all the coolness of a veteran".
ire choler anger a strong emotion; a feeling that is oriented toward some real or supposed grievance.
high_dudgeon dudgeon a feeling of intense indignation (now used only in the phrase `in high dudgeon').
dismay consternation alarm fear resulting from the awareness of danger.
horror intense and profound fear.
veneration reverence fear awe a feeling of profound respect for someone or something; "the fear of God"; "the Chinese reverence for the dead"; "the French treat food with gentle reverence"; "his respect for the law bordered on veneration".
self-doubt self-distrust diffidence lack of self-confidence.
worry trouble a strong feeling of anxiety; "his worry over the prospect of being fired"; "it is not work but worry that kills"; "he wanted to die and end his troubles".
scruple qualm misgiving uneasiness about the fitness of an action.
security freedom from anxiety or fear; "the watch dog gave her a feeling of security".
confidence a feeling of trust (in someone or something); "I have confidence in our team"; "confidence is always borrowed, never owned".
happiness emotions experienced when in a state of well-being.
bonheur (French) happiness and good humor.
joyousness joyfulness joy the emotion of great happiness.
triumph the exultation of victory.
intoxication excitement and elation beyond the bounds of sobriety; "the intoxication of wealth and power".
merriment gaiety a gay feeling.
mirthfulness mirth hilarity gleefulness glee great merriment.
belonging happiness felt in a secure relationship; "with his classmates he felt a sense of belonging".
comfortableness a feeling of being at ease in a relationship.
intimacy closeness a feeling of being intimate and belonging together; "their closeness grew as the night wore on".
togetherness affectionate closeness; "togetherness is the new wonder ingredient in marriage".
cheerfulness blitheness a feeling of spontaneous good spirits; "his cheerfulness made everyone feel better".
perkiness buoyancy cheerfulness that bubbles to the surface.
contentment happiness with one's situation in life.
pride satisfaction with your (or another's) achievements; "he takes pride in his son's success".
fulfilment fulfillment a feeling of satisfaction at having achieved your desires.
world-weariness weltschmerz sadness on thinking about the evils of the world.
broken_heart devastating sorrow and despair; "he is recovering from a broken heart"; "a broken heart languishes here".
discontentment discontentedness discontent a longing for something better than the present situation.
hope the general feeling that some desire will be fulfilled; "in spite of his troubles he never gave up hope".
optimism the optimistic feeling that all is going to turn out well.
sanguinity sanguineness feeling sanguine; optimistically cheerful and confident.
defeatism acceptance of the inevitability of defeat.
intimidation the feeling of discouragement in the face of someone's superior fame or wealth or status etc..
love a strong positive emotion of regard and affection; "his love for his work"; "children need a lot of love".
agape_love agape selfless love of one person for another without sexual implications (especially love that is spiritual in nature).
agape (Christian theology) the love of God or Christ for mankind.
ardour ardor intense feeling of love.
enamoredness amorousness a feeling of love or fondness.
puppy_love infatuation crush calf_love temporary love of an adolescent.
devotion devotedness feelings of ardent love; "their devotion to each other was beautiful".
warmness warmheartedness tenderness philia heart fondness affectionateness affection a positive feeling of liking; "he had trouble expressing the affection he felt"; "the child won everyone's heart"; "the warmness of his welcome made us feel right at home".
protectiveness a feeling of protective affection.
respect regard a feeling of friendship and esteem; "she mistook his manly regard for love"; "he inspires respect".
soft_spot a sentimental affection; "she had a soft spot for her youngest son".
benevolence disposition to do good.
beneficence doing good; feeling beneficent.
heartstrings your deepest feelings of love and compassion; "many adoption cases tug at the heartstrings".
misology hatred of reasoning.
misocainea hatred of new ideas.
class_feeling feelings of envy and resentment of one social or economic class for toward another.
belligerency belligerence hostile or warlike attitude or nature.
score grudge grievance a resentment strong enough to justify retaliation; "holding a grudge"; "settling a score".
envy enviousness a feeling of grudging admiration and desire to have something that is possessed by another.
vindictiveness vengefulness a malevolent desire for revenge.
good_temper good_humour good_humor amiability a cheerful and agreeable mood.
joviality jollity jolliness feeling jolly and jovial and full of good humor.
kindheartedness kind-heartedness sympathy arising from a kind heart.
tenderness tenderheartedness warm compassionate feelings.
forgiveness compassionate feelings that support a willingness to forgive.
zeal elan ardour ardor a feeling of strong eagerness (usually in favor of a person or cause); "they were imbued with a revolutionary ardor"; "he felt a kind of religious zeal".
exuberance joyful enthusiasm.
balanced_diet a diet that contains adequate amounts of all the necessary nutrients required for healthy growth and activity.
clear_liquid_diet a diet of fluids with minimal residues (fat-free broth or strained fruit juices or gelatin); cannot be used for more than one day postoperative.
fad_diet a reducing diet that enjoys temporary popularity.
low-fat_diet a diet containing limited amounts of fat and stressing foods high in carbohydrates; used in treatment of some gallbladder conditions.
haute_cuisine (French) an elaborate and skillful manner of preparing food.
square_meal a substantial and nourishing meal; "he seldom got three square meals a day".
potluck whatever happens to be available especially when offered to an unexpected guest or when brought by guests and shared by all; "having arrived unannounced we had to take potluck"; "a potluck supper".
spread feast banquet a meal that is well prepared and greatly enjoyed; "a banquet for the graduating seniors"; "the Thanksgiving feast"; "they put out quite a spread".
piece_de_resistance the most important dish of a meal.
bouillon a clear seasoned broth.
oxtail_soup a soup made from the skinned tail of an ox.
chowder a thick soup or stew made with milk and bacon and onions and potatoes.
hungarian_goulash gulyas goulash a rich meat stew highly seasoned with paprika.
bouillabaisse highly seasoned Mediterranean soup or stew made of several kinds of fish and shellfish with tomatoes and onions or leeks and seasoned with saffron and garlic and herbs.
ragout well-seasoned stew of meat and vegetables.
ratatouille a vegetable stew; usually made with tomatoes, eggplant, zucchini, peppers, onion, and seasonings.
viand a choice or delicious dish.
self-rising_flour self-raising_flour a commercially prepared mixture of flour and salt and a leavening agent.
corn_sugar dextrose used as sweetening agent.
sweetmeat a sweetened delicacy (as a preserve or pastry).
cooking_chocolate bitter_chocolate baking_chocolate pure unsweetened chocolate used in baking and icings and sauces and candy.
spun_sugar cotton_candy candyfloss a candy made by spinning sugar that has been boiled to a high temperature.
dragee silvery candy beads used for decorating cakes.
honey_crisp a crisp candy made with honey.
marzipan marchpane almond paste and egg whites.
sugar_candy made by boiling pure sugar until it hardens.
quiche_lorraine quiche made with cheese and bacon.
suet_pudding a sweet or savory pudding made with suet and steamed or boiled.
maraschino_cherry maraschino cherry preserved in true or imitation maraschino liqueur.
shortbread_cookie shortbread very rich thick butter cookie.
kiss a cookie made of egg whites and sugar.
molasses_cookie very spicy cookies sweetened partially with molasses.
jelly gelatin an edible jelly (sweet or pungent) made with gelatin and used as a dessert or salad base or a coating for foods.
hen flesh of an older chicken suitable for stewing.
squab dove flesh of a pigeon suitable for roasting or braising; flesh of a dove (young squab) may be broiled.
wildfowl flesh of any of a number of wild game birds suitable for food.
quail flesh of quail; suitable for roasting or broiling if young; otherwise must be braised.
barbeque barbecue meat that has been barbecued or grilled in a highly seasoned sauce.
top_round roast cut from the round; usually suitable for roasting.
bottom_round cut from the round; suitable for pot roast.
roast_beef beef_roast cut of beef suitable for roasting.
pastrami highly seasoned cut of smoked beef.
veal_roast roast_veal cut of veal suitable for roasting.
saddle_of_lamb backbone and both loins of a lamb.
roast_lamb lamb_roast a cut of lamb suitable for roasting.
leg_of_lamb gigot lamb leg suitable for roasting.
suckling_pig cochon_de_lait whole young pig suitable for roasting.
roast_pork pork_roast cut of pork suitable for roasting.
bacon_strip a slice of bacon.
bacon_rind the rind of bacon.
sausage highly seasoned minced meat stuffed in casings.
knockwurst knackwurst short thick highly seasoned sausage.
salami highly seasoned fatty sausage of pork and beef usually dried.
linguica a highly seasoned Portuguese pork sausage flavored with garlic and onions.
saveloy a ready-cooked and highly seasoned pork sausage.
roll bun small rounded bread either plain or sweet.
quick_bread breads made with a leavening agent that permits immediate baking.
rye_bread any of various breads made entirely or partly with rye flour.
soda_biscuit buttermilk_biscuit very tender biscuit partially leavened with buttermilk and soda.
fedelline extremely fine pasta thinner than vermicelli.
health_food any natural or prepared food popularly believed to promote good health.
junk_food food that tastes good but is high in calories having little nutritional value.
frumenty sweet spiced porridge made from hulled wheat.
eater any green goods that are good to eat; "these apples are good eaters".
fries french_fries french-fried_potatoes chips strips of potato fried in deep fat.
rhubarb pieplant long pinkish sour leafstalks usually eaten cooked and sweetened.
collards collard_greens kale that has smooth leaves.
buttercup_squash drum-shaped squash with dark green rind marked in silver or grey.
sprout a newly grown bud (especially from a germinating seed).
pimiento pimento fully ripened sweet red pepper; usually cooked.
salad_greens salad_green greens suitable for eating uncooked as in salads.
green_pea garden_pea fresh pea.
sugar_pea snow_pea green peas with flat edible pods.
sugar_snap_pea green peas with edible pods that are very crisp and not flat.
common_bean any of numerous beans eaten either fresh or dried.
snap_bean snap tender green beans without strings that easily snap into sections.
soybean soya_bean soya soy the most highly proteinaceous vegetable known; the fruit of the soybean plant is used in a variety of foods and as fodder (especially as a replacement for animal protein).
coffee_substitute a drink resembling coffee that is sometimes substituted for it.
plum_tomato a kind of cherry tomato that is frequently used in cooking rather than eaten raw.
stayman_winesap crisp tart apple; good for eating raw and suitable for cooking.
persimmon orange fruit resembling a plum; edible when fully ripe.
sour_orange seville_orange bitter_orange highly acidic orange used especially in marmalade.
sapote marmalade_plum mammee brown oval fruit flesh makes excellent sherbet.
plumcot hybrid between plum and apricot.
coconut_water coconut_milk clear to whitish fluid from within a fresh coconut.
pike highly valued northern freshwater fish with lean flesh.
sea_squab pufferfish puffer blowfish delicacy that is highly dangerous because of a potent nerve poison in ovaries and liver.
fugu a blowfish highly prized as a delicacy in Japan but highly dangerous because the skin and organs are poisonous.
mullet grey_mullet gray_mullet highly valued lean flesh of marine or freshwater mullet.
sole fillet_of_sole lean flesh of any of several flatfish.
lemon_sole english_sole highly valued almost pure white flesh.
snapper flesh of any of various important food fishes of warm seas.
beluga_caviar roe of beluga sturgeon usually from Russia; highly valued.
chef's_salad the combination salad prepared as a particular chef's specialty.
slaw coleslaw basically shredded cabbage.
herb aromatic potherb used in cookery for its savory qualities.
fines_herbes a mixture of finely chopped fresh herbs; "an omelet flavored with fines herbes".
chives cylindrical leaves used fresh as a mild onion-flavored seasoning.
chinese_mustard very hot prepared mustard.
parsley aromatic herb with flat or crinkly leaves that are cut finely and used to garnish food.
rue leaves sometimes used for flavoring fruit or claret cup but should be used with great caution: can cause irritation like poison ivy.
clary_sage fresh leaves used in omelets and fritters and with lamb.
savoury savory either of two aromatic herbs of the mint family.
tomato_sauce sauce made with a puree of tomatoes (or strained tomatoes) with savory vegetables and other seasonings; can be used on pasta.
half-and-half_dressing half mayonnaise and half vinaigrette seasoned with minced garlic and mashed anchovies and grated Parmesan cheese; especially good for combination salads.
easter_egg an egg-shaped candy used to celebrate Easter.
chocolate_egg egg-shaped chocolate candy.
candy_egg egg-shaped candy.
western_omelet a firm omelet that has diced ham and peppers and onions.
pasteurized_milk milk that has been exposed briefly to high temperatures to destroy microorganisms and prevent fermentation.
whole_milk milk from which no constituent (such as fat) has been removed.
heavy_whipping_cream double_creme cream with a fat content of 48% or more.
double_cream fresh soft French cheese containing at least 60% fat.
triple_creme triple_cream fresh soft French cheese containing at least 72% fat.
double_gloucester a smooth firm mild orange-red cheese.
liederkranz a soft cheese with a strong odor and flavor.
limburger a soft white cheese with a very strong pungent odor and flavor.
marshmallow_fluff a very sweet white spread resembling marshmallow candy.
pate_de_foie_gras foie_gras a pate made from goose liver (marinated in Cognac) and truffles.
sweetening sweetener something added to foods to make them taste sweeter.
aspartame an artificial sweetener made from aspartic acid; used as a calorie-free sweetener.
corn_syrup syrup prepared from corn.
arroz_con_pollo rice and chicken cooked together Spanish style; highly seasoned especially with saffron.
marrow bone_marrow very tender and very nutritious tissue from marrowbones.
scallopini scallopine sauteed cutlets (usually veal or poultry) that have been pounded thin and coated with flour.
succotash fresh corn and lima beans with butter or cream.
tostada a crisp flat tortilla.
potable drinkable drink beverage any liquid suitable for drinking; "may I take your beverage order?".
mixture intermixture concoction any foodstuff made by combining different ingredients; "he volunteered to taste her latest concoction"; "he drank a mixture of beer and lemonade".
lekvar a sweet filling made of prunes or apricots.
quaff a hearty draft.
toast pledge a drink in honor of or to the health of a person or event.
libation a serving (of wine) poured out in honor of a deity.
libation (facetious) a serving of an alcoholic beverage.
light_beer lager with reduced alcohol content.
guinness a kind of bitter stout.
cabernet_sauvignon cabernet superior Bordeaux type of red wine.
eau_de_vie strong coarse brandy.
bathtub_gin homemade gin especially that made illegally.
cognac high quality grape brandy distilled in the Cognac district of France.
slivovitz a colorless plum brandy popular in the Balkans.
schnaps schnapps any of various strong liquors especially a Dutch spirit distilled from potatoes.
firewater any strong spirits (such as strong whisky or rum).
liqueur cordial strong highly flavored sweet liquor usually drunk after a meal.
anisette_de_bordeaux anisette liquorice-flavored usually colorless sweet liqueur made from aniseed.
drambuie a sweet Scotch whisky liqueur.
grasshopper a cocktail made of creme de menthe and cream (sometimes with creme de cacao).
manhattan a cocktail made with whiskey and sweet vermouth with a dash of bitters.
vodka_martini martini made with vodka rather than gin.
stinger a cocktail made of made of creme de menthe and brandy.
mocha_coffee mocha a superior dark coffee made from beans from Arabia.
criollo cocoa of superior quality.
orange_juice bottled or freshly squeezed juice of oranges.
lemon_juice usually freshly squeezed juice of lemons.
lime_juice usually freshly squeezed juice of limes.
carrot_juice usually freshly squeezed juice of carrots.
cupper cuppa a cup of tea.
pekoe orange_pekoe a superior grade of black tea; grown in India and Sri Lanka and Java.
water a liquid necessary for the life of most animals and plants; "he asked for a drink of water".
drinking_water water suitable for drinking.
brave people who are brave; "the home of the free and the brave".
timid cautious people who are fearful and cautious; "whitewater rafting is not for the timid".
master_race herrenvolk a race that considers itself superior to all others and fitted to rule the others.
subroutine_library program_library library (computing) a collection of standard programs and subroutines that are stored and available for immediate use.
pair brace a set of two similar things considered as a unit.
triplet triple trio triad a set of three similar things considered as a unit.
quartette quartet quadruplet quadruple a set of four similar things considered as a unit.
quintuplet quintuple quintette quintet a set of five similar things considered as a unit.
sextette sextet sestet a set of six similar things considered as a unit.
septette septet a set of seven similar things considered as a unit.
octette octet a set of eight similar things considered as a unit.
power_couple a couple both of whom have high-powered careers or are politically influential.
caste in some social insects (such as ants) a physically distinct individual or group of individuals specialized to perform certain functions in the colony.
set a group of things of the same kind that belong together and are so used; "a set of books"; "a set of golf clubs"; "a set of teeth".
bracket a category falling within certain defined limits.
law_firm a firm of lawyers.
commodity_brokerage a brokerage firm dealing in commodities.
the_city used to allude to the securities industry of Great Britain.
target_company takeover_target a company that has been chosen as attractive for takeover by a potential acquirer.
underperformer a business that is less successful than expected.
powerhouse a team considered to be the best of its class.
lutheran_church the Protestant denomination adhering to the views of Martin Luther.
presbyterian_church the Protestant denomination adhering to the views of John Calvin.
arminian_church the Protestant denomination adhering to the views of Jacobus Arminius.
methodists methodist_church a Protestant denomination founded on the principles of John Wesley and Charles Wesley.
conservative_judaism Jews who keep some of the requirements of the Mosaic law but allow for adaptation of other requirements (as some of the dietary laws) to fit modern circumstances.
islamism a fundamentalist Islamic revivalist movement generally characterized by moral conservatism and the literal interpretation of the Koran and the attempt to implement Islamic values in all aspects of life.
sunni_islam sunni one of the two main branches of orthodox Islam.
brahminism brahmanism the religious and social system of orthodox Hinduism.
taoism religion adhering to the teaching of Lao-tzu.
scientology church_of_scientology a new religion founded by L. Ron Hubbard in 1955 and characterized by a belief in the power of a person's spirit to clear itself of past painful experiences through self-knowledge and spiritual fulfillment.
fish_species a species of fish.
department_of_anthropology anthropology_department the academic department responsible for teaching and research in anthropology.
art_department the academic department responsible for teaching art and art appreciation.
department_of_biology biology_department the academic department responsible for teaching and research in biology.
department_of_chemistry chemistry_department the academic department responsible for teaching and research in chemistry.
department_of_computer_science the academic department responsible for teaching and research in computer science.
economics_department department_of_economics the academic department responsible for teaching and research in economics.
english_department department_of_english the academic department responsible for teaching English and American literature.
history_department department_of_history the academic department responsible for teaching history.
linguistics_department department_of_linguistics the academic department responsible for teaching and research in linguistics.
mathematics_department department_of_mathematics the academic department responsible for teaching and research in mathematics.
philosophy_department department_of_philosophy the academic department responsible for teaching philosophy.
physics_department department_of_physics the academic department responsible for teaching and research in physics.
music_department department_of_music the academic department responsible for teaching music and music appreciation.
psychology_department department_of_psychology the academic department responsible for teaching and research in psychology.
sociology_department department_of_sociology the academic department responsible for teaching and research in sociology.
advertising_division advertising_department the division of a business that is responsible for advertising.
purchasing_department the division of a business that is responsible for purchases.
security_department security a department responsible for the security of the institution's property and workers; "the head of security was a former policeman".
ds bureau_of_diplomatic_security the bureau in the State Department that is responsible for the security of diplomats and embassies overseas.
generally_accepted_accounting_principles gaap a collection of rules and procedures and conventions that define accepted accounting practice; includes broad guidelines as well as detailed procedures.
pantheon all the gods of a religion.
royalty royal_line royal_house royal_family royal persons collectively; "the wedding was attended by royalty".
judiciary bench persons who administer justice.
second_estate lords_temporal the nobility in France and the peerage in Britain.
sea_power a nation that possesses formidable naval strength.
ruck herd a crowd especially of ordinary or undistinguished persons or things; "his brilliance raised him above the ruck"; "the children resembled a fairy herd".
minstrel_show a troupe of performers in blackface typically giving a comic program of negro songs and jokes.
royal_air_force raf the airforce of Great Britain.
full_complement complement number needed to make up a whole force; "a full complement of workers".
faithful any loyal and steadfast following.
jockey_club a club to promote and regulate horse racing.
majors major_league big_league the most important league in any sport (especially baseball).
lions_club international_association_of_lions_clubs club dedicated to promoting responsible citizenship and good government and community and national and international welfare.
syndicate pool consortium an association of companies for some definite purpose.
division class a league ranked by quality; "he played baseball in class D for two years"; "Princeton is in the NCAA Division 1-AA".
cadre a nucleus of military personnel capable of expansion.
social_gathering social_affair a gathering for the purpose of promoting fellowship.
stag_party smoker a party for men only (or one considered suitable for men only).
democratic_party the older of two major political parties in the United States.
labour_party labour labor british_labour_party a political party formed in Great Britain in 1900; characterized by the promotion of labor's interests and formerly the socialization of key industries.
academy a school for special training.
secretarial_school a school where secretarial skills (typing and shorthand and filing etc) are taught.
vocational_school trade_school a secondary school teaching the skilled trades.
youth_subculture a minority youth culture whose distinctiveness depended largely on the social class and ethnic background of its members; often characterized by its adoption of a particular music genre.
caste a social class separated from others by distinctions of hereditary rank or profession or wealth.
brahmin brahman the highest of the four varnas: the priestly or sacerdotal category.
rajanya the second highest of the four varnas: the noble or warrior category.